That said, it's hard to keep the boys busy. I'm not anti-TV or computer, but I don't want to the kids sitting in front of a screen eight hours a day. So what do we do for fun?
Luxurious color is at your fingertips. Rick cremes range from a delicate pastel like “Seashell” to an adventuresome white like “Snow”.
Yes, you might say – but the USA has remained stable since. True, it has: but my father fought with American airmen for much of the Second World War – and he told me many times, “After a few beers, the Rebs and the Yankees were soon at each other’s throats”. As late as 1961, a Federal Army had to intervene in the American South in order to force through Kennedy’s educational racial-integration laws
Yes, “perhaps” leaves room for creativity and dreams. It is a word which suggests open doors, wings and strength. I think I’ll use this word a bit more often.
My favorite film-watching candy, bar none. These sweet little nuggets of chocolate have barely any scent at all, owing to the confectioner's resin that gives each piece a shiny gloss and prevents them from melting all over your salty fingers in the movie theater. The California raisins within are surprisingly tart and chewy, no doubt a calculated move to satisfy all the tastebud highlights when consumed with movie-style popcorn: sweet, sour, and salty. Created in 1927 by Blumenthal Brothers Chocolate Company, they are now distributed by Nestle and are the corporation's third best selling confection in the U.S. The chocolate itself is a slightly grainy milk variety; nothing too complex to detract from the plump raisin goodness. The tart fruit is the take-away flavor here, mellowed only slightly by the milk chocolate.
But John was an addict used to scheming and scamming, and turning down a couple of free bags wasn't possible for him. This was like finding a little sparkle of Klondike gold – even if it meant hauling a cripple up a steep mountainside to get it. It was another little make for John and he was thinking of tomorrow and I wasn't. Tomorrow I'd be gone. In a place where money couldn't help. John would still be here, fretting about the days to come and how to avoid having to regret selling his entire supply of methadone.
Unroll the pastry and spread the cheese, feta, sprinkle with oregano and black pepper. Cover with cheese the 3/4 of the sheet.
“There are too many people that depend on me. I’m too obligated. I’m in too far to get out.”
No yummy yummy cupcakes at the party???
-Pledgers can pledge for more than one RSO
Steve Burgess, Scottish Green, had excused himself quite reasonably on the grounds that his wife is having a baby, which is the sort of thing that takes clear priority over a hustings. I had told Owen Dudley Edwards this when we were chatting over coffee beforehand, and so in the Chair’s opening remarks, Steve Burgess and his wife were wished every happiness and good fortune in the birth of their child. (Audience, startled but pleased; “Hear! Hear!” and a round of applause. I think Steve had just picked up several votes for not being there, which is unusual at a hustings!)
Three organizers of the SOS March met Wednesday for an hour with senior-level Education Department officials, including two press officers and the deputy chief of staff. U.S. Secretary of Education Arne Duncan was in attendance for about 10 minutes, and described the meeting as a “good conversation.” He added that “there is a lot of common ground out there.”
The best of these “tricks” and probably one of the more obvious ones, considering the lyrics I chose for the top of the post, is the natural make-up look. I can’t tell you how many guys have said to me something like, “I love that you don’t wear make-up” or even better – “wait, I didn’t realize you had freckles” when they actually do see me without make-up on.
~ Happy Heiny's
There are many good things that we can do as Christians, but the fact is that most of those good things will happily be done also by people who are not Christians. But if we Christians fail to proclaim the gospel of Jesus, who else is going to do that? No one (p. 120).
a slight honey aftertaste left by my lipbalm
“The code he gave was ‘stone, base, one’. That was Peters’, an infiltrator confirmed dead six months ago’s call sign. I knew Peters and that wasn’t him.”
Claude Michael Gann, 41, Roswell, Ga.
Back when I started my path into photography I would regularly practice with my cousin who would help me out and patiently model for me. But there was something just not quite right. I would reflect on the sessions and in all honesty the shoot would be quiet, not a lot of communication between us, long pauses whilst I was working out my settings, and a general stiffness in the small amount of useable images I would come out with.
Someone who truly understands this and keeps it top of mind while imparting their duty makes the most ideal employee, the most ideal leader.
Kimmy didn't learn to tie her shoes until she was 12. She owns over 15 pairs of Converse shoes, all in different colors. She reads several books at once. She can't grow plants to save her life, she looks at them and they die. She can't have cereal with the milk in it. She drinks her milk on the side. She hardly ever wears matching socks. She owns about 6 umbrellas, purely for the fact that she loves them. She lives in Arizona. It hardly rains there.
E’ un peccato, ha detto mia figlia, che poi questi allestimenti vengano buttati via quando non servono più.
Walking to my room my anticipation starts to bubble over. Jessie will meat me in my room. It was my father’s and mother’s room. I can remember going into their room at night after having a bad dream. My surroundings dark and daunting. I felt like the shadows would reach out and grab me. Pull me away to some far away evil place. I would stand in the door way silently watching them sleep. My father would wake up and motion for me to come over. Climbing into bed with them felt worm and safe. Like nothing could hurt me. I would snuggle in between them. My father always smelled like a cool breeze and flowers. He smelled like the outside world, a place I had not been to. On these nights he would sing a lullaby for me. A lullaby he wrote when I was only a few moths old.
Here is Audrey's card:
I have known Brian Sussman from the years when he and I would get together on the radio in his hometown of San Francisco on KFSO to discuss the events of the day. A television journalist turned meteorologist, Sussman used his knowledge to debunk the global warming hoax and, when a cache of emails between its leading perpetrators was leaked to the Internet, he wrote “Climategate”, a book still worth reading, but his latest book, Eco-Tyranny: How the Left’s Green Agenda Will Dismantle America ($25.95, WND Books) should be “must” reading for anyone who has begun to suspect something very dangerous about the activities of the leading environmental organizations, the United Nations Environmental Program, and the Environmental Protection Agency, all of whom are engaged in an attack on private property, the keystone of capitalism and foundation of the U.S. economy. Step by step, Sussman demonstrates how environmentalism hides its deep roots in communism and its contempt for humanity. Even as the global warming hoax fell apart, the Greens are engaged in a new version in the name of “sustainability”, claiming the Earth cannot sustain its population and the use of its bounty, particularly in the area of energy, is destroying the Earth. Communism is responsible for at least 110 million deaths since it was introduced in Russia in 1917 and later in China and elsewhere. It is the enemy of freedom and its latest reincarnation as environmentalism is as well. This is a chilling examination of the way Americans are being denied access to the nation's treasure trove of oil, natural gas, and coal. It is a look at the way more and more of the landmass of the nation is being put off-limits to development by the government. If you read no other book this year, this would be the one I would recommend for your sake, for your family’s and the nation’s future.
Each criminal offense is made up of different aspects. Furthermore, each law is made up of numerous intricacies which may be difficult to a lay person. Furthermore, nearly all laws talk about some other rules that have a lot more complex terms. Additionally, there are processes that need to be done regardless of the law. Lots of defendants think they could walk into the court room and defend themselves in a great way. Things might seem easy. However, it isn’t so. As a result, an expert is necessary to make sure everything is taken care of precisely.
there was nowhere else that I needed to be.
Aha! Now I see the source of the real problem in this query. You're trying to make a point. Don't. The story has to come first. I'm fundamentally uninterested in"sleazy cops, bureaucratic control freaks, and professional hitters" because they are one-dimensional characters you're using to make a point.
She enters my dream
05-Big Youth-Four Sevens
Under a northerly influence, clear and dry skies, and a new moon, a very evident movement occurred last night. This movement, however, was not by birds, but by solar radiation hitting the upper atmosphere. The Green Tower, though no longer present, lived up to it’s colored name, as hues of green shimmered past over the big lake. Do birds use the aurora borealis as a migration directional tool?
Two plates were made yesterday. These were the “scrap ends” from the large stock pieces. About 18″x24″ in size.
I turned and smiled at him as he stared with his eyes wide open. Obviously he had not meant to say what he was about to say out loud. He repeated himself a few times as I continued to smile. Honestly, I was just trying to communicate with him that I was not the type to scoff at strangers because they have the audacity to talk to me.
As for existing stockpiles of enriched 20 % Uranium, part of these can be kept where they are under IAEA check, and their future usage can be negotiated in a separate track, leading in any case to secure all parties involved. An enounced principle of maintaining a pride quantity of 20 % Uranium and centrifuges on Iranian soil that will not shake the basis of negotiations can be elaborated.
This category has five titles listed because there was a tie on number of votes and first place choices. The Walking Dead was my vote here, but I was kicking myself for not recommending Clint, which had a great year, and Kirby Genesis, which I just love. I've enjoyed what I've read of Locke and Key and the new Animal Man.
Includes volume adjustment, voice modulation, auto shut off and hip clip.
Finally the bomb dropped. At this point in the pregnancy, I had finished training for a new management position and was closing the store for the night. My hormones were raging and the workload was stressful. I desperately needed someone to understand that I was tired, disgusted, and unhappy. I needed someone to be in my corner and tell me that despite work and my feelings about my pregnancy, everything else was fine in my life. I needed my husband.
Now, here are the Hop Details:
I took my hands away from my face and looked at her as if she was from Mars.
Disappointed he bent down to pick up the bowl. She watched his head dip below the table. Her survival instincts kicked into high gear. She only had a moment to act. Right when his head was level with the table she jabbed at him with the handle of the spoon. She felt it sink in to something soft, followed by a warm gush of fluid. He let out a blood curtling scream and she snatched her hand back in fear. He fell forward thrashing in pain, the spoon sticking out of his left eye. She didn’t wait around to survey the damage, scrambling out of the chair she forced herself to run. Her legs trembled under the strain threatning to buckle under her. She could hear him behind her coming down the hall screaming obsenities at her.
On the last day of that tourist season, the sky was sulking since afternoon. Soon after the vehicles and elephants returned from the evening safari, the wind gained strength, and a storm snapped the power supply.
Now it's off carbonating in a corner. Hopefully this will be on tap in a couple of weeks. Details. to come.
Love Jenn aka Fox in the City
She walked to the station to borrow a gas can and buy some gas. The attendant told her that the only gas can he owned had been loaned out, but she could wait until it was returned. Since she was on the way to see a patient, she decided not to wait and walked back to her car to look for something in her car that she could fill with gas.
I took measurements of my body when I first started and I lost inches in almost all areas. The most significant is that I lost 1 3/4″ on my waist! Surprisingly I didn’t lose any on my thighs but I feel like my legs are slimmer. At least I think they are more firm.
I simply refuse to turn the air conditioner on in May !!!
They make so many excuses to get people to forgo self-publishing and to come back to them. Sadly, that doesn’t seem to be working anymore. With J.K Rowling and Jackie Collins leaving their once publishers and taking arms in being their own company, this just goes to show you how out of touch publishers are with this new generation, which has been a big issue to me since way back when I started to write.
For those not paying attention, video surfaced of this African American woman, currently an employee of the USDA, speaking at an NAACP function and her remarks were excerpted by right wing media hacks to make it appear that years ago she had denied aid to a Caucasian farmer based on racial tension between them. After the excerpt went public, Sherrod was immediately forced to resign but within days the full tape aired, showing that she did in fact help the farmer and in her speech she was using her own feelings of racial resentment as an example of what not to do. Her acceptance of a new position is still pending.
I created a post-it note holder using an svg cut file from DtsArt. I love this cut file because it cuts and scores the base for me. I added some pretty pp with pink it.
Monday morning at 11:11AM, I kneel down . . .
around that time and they served to increase my admiration for Simon Templar, initially awakened by Roger Moore’s TV depiction of him). However, at a certain stage he lost interest in it and my masterpiece was never finished.
Plain flour- 1 1/2 cups
-Little bit olive oil
1/3 cup craisins
Strong performances from another really good cast made this even better. And at least this monster wasn’t unrealistic!
At first, what disconcerted me most was that I could connect no ideas at all with the word Austerlitz. If my new name had been Morgan or Jones, I could have related it to reality. I even new the name Jaques froma French nursery rhyme. But I had never heard of an Austerlitz before, and from the first I was convinced that no one else bore that name, no one in Wales, or in the Isles, or anywhere else in the world.
With this excellent writing comes the story of a little woman warrior who will stop at nothing to keep the roof over her family’s head. She’s threatened, insulted, and even beaten bloody – and onward she goes, fueled by loyalty to the ones in her care.
So have you made any scrappy resolutions for 2011? Mine is to be better organised and hopefully complete more than half of what I start! LOL With this in mind I decided to make Chris a book to keep all his web stuff in. It is almost impossible to remember where and what you have signed up for on the old Interwebs, all those web addresses and passwords to try and remember.... so I have made him a book to keep track of them.
to it, one is amazed by the sheer enormity of the vehicle - it's huge - about sixteen feet long. If it ever comes to your town, make sure you go and see it - it's well worth it.
My favourite bit is where he says "Oooh, Betty, I have been articulated!!!!!" Just saying that to myself makes me fall on the ground in histerics!
I went for the black and white monotone feel. With my very favorite man EVA!!
So growing up my parents would say, “The car won’t run until you buckle up!” We would all happily buckle up to get the car to start, because OBVIOUSLY there is a mechanism that prevents the car from starting if you don’t have your seatbelt in place. I come to find out that was a lie. Cars start even if you don’t wear your seatbelt. And not all parents tell their children this. When I have kids, I will tell them the same thing because it is funny.
Huge thanks to The Elephant for sending this across the Channel...
and Rice a Riso for me after work
1 biblical
It's been all about family time from Christmas up till now, with the past week bringing an unexpected opportunity for the four of us to be together here - a somewhat rare type of reunion these days!
Dear Lord, help me to love as you love. Help me to love even the most unlovable. This is not easy. I can only do so with your grace. Thank you for loving me. Amen.
The mayor did not immediately respond to a request for comment Wednesday, but said in the radio interview that he has received hundreds of e-mails from all over the country from people offering their support to the city, including pro bono legal representation if the organization decides to file suit against the city.
1 theirs
Lunch: Buffalo Collard Wraps with Coleslaw
But where would he find a donor?
So all I can say is go. Have a wonderful time and learn a lot. If there is one zoo, or animal park, I am already very excited about taking my daughter to on my next trip to the UK it is this one. It is worth every penny and, as an added bonus, isn't far from the coast or the Lake District either.
It's nonetheless a strong and invigorating Latin rock jazz fusion, boasting some really hot playing, both in the ensemble work and improvisation. The six cuts, save one, all run more than five minutes, the closing "Latin Boogaloo" approaching ten minutes in length. Often this is closer to rockified salsa music than it is to the salsified rock music of lead guitarist Jorge Santana.
Regal success.
1 pkg. (10 oz.) marshmallows
Publisher of the Year
Ok, so here's the backstory. After a night of staying out too late with a group of Russians drinking in Copenhagen. (Did I mention that I was in Copenhagen?) I woke up and stumbled into a coffee shop that was a few blocks from my hotel, it had been my regular spot all week because the espresso was REALLY (Joe and the Juice) good and they were the only place in Copenhagen not playing Adele non-stop (not that there's anything wrong with that.) After hitting my targeted heart rate, I had a few hours to kill so I took a walk. A little while later I found a stationary store, within 30 seconds I was in there.
“Better to educate than to enforce”
Now you can listen to arguments all day about how things have improved since the ANC’s version of Marxist democracy was implemented in 1994. What you have to keep in mind is that South Africa has historically been the strongest economy in Africa. The only proof you need of that fact is that hundreds of kilometres of electrified fences had to be erected on South Africa’s northern borders during the “evil Apartheid regime’s” tenure, not to keep citizens from leaving like in the good old Soviet occupied East-Germany, but to keep keen Africans out of the country. Africans with enough grey matter to realise being second class citizens in South Africa was far better than first class citizens in their respective black government African countries. I dare you to mention this fact alone to the bunch of libtards and wait for their response. Just don’t hold your breath whilst waiting.
First, Pat Walsh, whose The Crowfield Curse was a runner-up in the Times/Chicken House Children's Books Competition in 2008 and was shortlisted for the Waterstone's Children's Fiction Prize when it was published in 2010. It told the story of William an orphan boy taken in by a monastery in the 14th century and befriended by a Hob, a friendly nature spirit. They discover after a complicated plot, a buried Angel in a place avoided by locals and monks alike. And it is - terrifyingly - still alive.
The appointment for the transfusion was at 10 am, but it was 1 pm before the unit was actually flowing. After the first unit of blood, her blood pressure was rising to normal ranges. The nurse looked at her and said in a southern drawl: "Girl, you needed that blood!" You've got some color in your cheeks now!". Mother has been is in bed so much of the time during the past month that she is losing muscle tone. The physical therapist are working with her to build that strength back up. The doctor has ordered her to eat lots of meat to build up those red blood cell.
We finished off a perfectly good Friday wih another trip to the glorious Southampton Arms, where we made it through all the beers and most of the ciders. And still had room for some chocolate on the way home.
Denise over at 2nd Grade Ponderings has great freebies! I just found her blog and I love the place value activity she currently has on her blog! She hasn't made a post in a while, but I can't wait to see what she comes up with next!
In my new apartment, we sacrificed a large bedroom for a kick-ass Chapel St location. Consequently we had to economise when it came to organising more clothes than David Jones. Aside from a lot of op shop donations and a quickly filling rubbish bin for dilapidated shoes, we invested in several under-bed rollaways to fill with winter clothes, now that summer was on its way (a bold move!). Today I pulled on my work staple, a tailored navy blue suit and patent black heeled pumps, and mused that very soon, this too would find a home in the tubs beneath my bed.
Her name is Bella. I guess if I wanted to be like Beyonce I should name her something like "Bella Bleu Bunnie" or something like that. LOL Oh well, Bella is happy just the way she is. (I know many of you are thinking I've been down in my stampin' studio by myself waaaaay tooooo long!) LOL
● This invention will completely restructure and revolutionize the world’s
“There was an explosion from below!” he shouted.
Thing is, for you blood elves, it kinda sucks because if you’d had this idea a couple years ago, we could have done something about it. Like if you could make a move right after the truth about Kael’thas came out, there’d probably be enough backlash against him in Silvermoon that the people would be all over a new leader. Open arms, figurehead installed, profit. Of course, back at the time when the iron was hot, we had Thrall running things all white-hat style and me off in Nagrand still cutting myself and shit. But still. Good job being slow with this idea just the same. Honestly, though, trying to do it that way now, we’re just going to get stuck with uprisings and unrest and all kinds of other crap.
Some have asked: What’s next? I don’t have an answer to that question right now. But I suspect we will drink again from the glory that is Italy, and that someday our group will re-form, and we will again be pilgrims on a journey and not mere tourists on vacation. I love you all.
BITTER GREENS & YOU Do you like bitter greens? Did you know what they were before now? (Now you do, yes?!) Do you try to remove the bitterness from greens or do you revel in that taste sensation? Do you have a favorite recipe? You know I'd love to have you share one! C'mon, tell me all about you and bitter greens!
Dried red chillies – 2, broken into halves
What did you think
He went to work and I argued mentally with him. Sometimes (okay, most of the time) it seems like he strikes the same place over and over again. It distracts me in all the wrong kinds of ways, unless of course his goal is to get down to what is really going on in my heart and mind.
"I like to eat cupcakes."
Fill Light (70-80)
It's a beautiful day today in my part of the world. The birds are in full nesting mode and I suspect I will soon have a family nesting on the eve, right near my bedroom window. I hope so. I'd love to listen to them as they grow and it is a relatively safe place from my cats.
Arena is a fitting end to all of this as it is really a best of package disguised as a live album with a new song in Wild Boys.
It's been a crazy busy time... between my Grandma, her surgery, her heart attack, and recovery and caring for my Grandpa on top of running MY family... it seems like I am constantly running, all day, every day.
Sit in my bed and wonder what I am supposed to do with the rest of the day.
Hoping to be back soon,
I did none of the above. The closest I got was playing 5th and 6th grade basketball and I was terrible. I mean, really terrible.
I asked hubby to pick a number between 1 and 70.
Ending: B
"There are two reasons we can't give back the liver," said Labuschagne.
34. Marsha Ambrosuis - Late Nights & Early Mornings
This treasure sits at an intersection of two exceedingly narrow roads with practically no shoulders. I pulled over somehow or another, which meant the car was still in the road; leaped across the ditch; and started snapping away.
Firasat Ali, J.D. (John Marshall Law School, Chicago), Trainer & Mentor
There is only habit standing between me and non-bottled-water-buying me. My home water from the tank is so much nicer, actually sweet. The rain in my part of the world is about as unpolluted as rain can be. And plastic water bottles are one of thoes thoughtless inanities for which we are trading the future of the planet.
Now does it sound interesting? Of course with so many public domain Christian books available, why not reprocess them to make money. You think that they’re just simple public domain contents? Yes, they seemed so simple but you can earn big sums of money through them. You just have to be smart and resourceful.
The last two days were horrifically cold and wet. If I was in Boston during winter, it would not seem so bad, 35 degrees is not horrific. However, when the house you are in has no insulation, the windows are not meant to keep cold out, and the air is wet with the cold - it is miserable. I stayed in last night because I figured who in their right mind is going to go out?? I cooked in the kitchen for hours to keep warm. I am rather happy Sorin was not around to take a picture, I was wearing leg warmers over my jeans, multiple socks with my muppet slipper-socks over them, long sleeve shirt, 2 sweaters and my scarf. Once I got cooking though, the scarf came off. ;o) But I was a funny sight for sure!
She thinks nothing of writing 150,000 of a novel before getting a commission and is one of the most disciplined and determined writers I know. She also wrote I am the Great Horse, one of my all time favourite YA novels, so when I heard Katherine was venturing into Arthurian territory, I knew readers were in for a treat.
The quilted petticoat is easily the heaviest part of the whole garment, heavier than the pannier. But it does give the gown an excellent shape and look, and, really, well fitted stays help to carry the weight.
All my life
You were in love, everything was perfect and you were picking out china patterns. Then, all of a sudden, it’s over and you can’t breathe anymore because you’re crying so hard and the world is an awful place in which to live. You wallow, you argue, you become bitter toward your friends and their successful relationships. You get really drunk and make somewhat terrible mistakes. You eat copious amounts of Ben & Jerry’s and spend most nights curled up on your sofa cursing the world and texting guys you don’t like simply for the attention.
Mara moved in a little closer to the bar, still staring at Mr. Hottie.
Writing Instructions: How do you write? (I wanted to know how J.K. Rowling wrote and I couldn’t find anything so I decided to write an entry about this. Maybe I also recalled my thesis paper and one of the questions was this, but I think I answered this in a lofty or pretentious manner. I will answer this question in a more detailed way.)
that the so-called “Illuminati family" claim descent from the Fallen Angels, which are mentioned in the Book of Genesis, chapter 6, where they’re described as “sons of God”, “mighty men”, “men of renown”, “giants”, and so forth… who impregnated the beautiful women on earth (Gen 6:2). Do not for one moment think these descriptions imply greatness or goodness… They were EVIL, hence the reason why a flood was brought "upon the world of the ungodly" (2 Peter 2:5) as prophesied by Enoch (Jude 14)… and that flood was not global.
Much is this is able to happen because of antibiotics. Before the discovery of antibiotics, a small cut could kill you if it were to get infected. Infection was one of the leading causes of death. Wounded soldiers would die in the hospital from infections, and even today, in diseases such as AIDS, the virus itself doesn’t kill you, but the infections and small colds do, since the body’s immune system can’t fight off the bacteria. It’s easy to say that bacteria are very deadly, but we just have the resources to combat them. All of this could change if bacteria become resistant to antibiotics.
Race Cottam are one of those practices, that seem to appear a lot on BBA (this one, for instance), who get prizes from Building magazine for being a good employer. They're almost always bad architects aren't they?
She left the cousin and wandered off with the boy. Small clouds of steel-wool begun to drift in. They walked into a park where boom-box r'n'b floated through the air that was already thick with BBQ smoke and frightened baby birds.
This wordless book is something very, very special.
On the other hand, some people won't write in a particular genre or category because said genre or category hasn't sold in forever. That's fine, but you should always be aware that today's Huge Trend™ was under everyone's radar yesterday. (Not that I expect poetry sales to magically take off OH WAIT THAT IS SORT OF HAPPENING**.) Which leads me to my next point:
And, of course, the international interlocutor cannot have prejudices and biases and predetermined notional approach to the task. The talks have to be conducted in a balanced environment with equal weightage being accorded to both the communicating partners, irrespective of the status of the individual countries on the geopolitical index, keeping the cultural sensibilities of both the sides in view.
In fact, I do not think Lewis is remotely racist on or off stage. He can be xenophobic on stage, but that is perhaps a sign that he has ‘gone native’ after too many years living in Britain.
Thereafter, I said to myself: “If I can’t be the next Marc Jacobs or Kate Moss or Beyonce, I will be a fashion editor to a major glossy in the country.
Wretched, poor and pitiful
So anyway, yeah, my weekend kinda sucked. And my hubby was off. He only gets weekends off every 6 weeks :(
7. Thee Headcoats - Pocahontas Was Her Name
“My improved confidence/speaking skills has helped my career as well as Verizon Connected Solutions since we are now working on developing partnerships/joint ventures with some large manufacturers and I am involved with seminars to promote these potential partnerships. Since I began working with Kirstin I’ve had several speaking opportunities and I can tell you her methods work. In fact, because of my work with Kirstin, I gave testimony in court that caused VCS to win a nearly $1 million lawsuit with customer who refused to pay. I can’t thank Kirstin enough!”
It’s tough, but I’m finishing up my third year now and I really do need to start thinking about my future first. Not working on my story for a few days makes me cranky, so I still try to sneak it in for a moment or two during a not-so-busy day... but if I don’t get to work on it for a while, you know what? It’s not going to kill me. At this point I need discipline and perspective, and I need to realize that my writing isn’t going away – it’ll still be there at the end of the semester and I can concentrate on it all I want then.
LOCATION FORECAST POINT COORDINATES ARRIVAL TIME
“Here.” I hear a voice say, and look up. It’s Rose, she’s coming towards Me, dressed in the fine green dresses of the serving girls. “Let me warm you.” She says removing her dress and pressing her naked body against mine. My body heats up in a way it’s never done before. And the laughing of the crone changes into the cracking of a fire in the cave, and the Ravens crying silences to the gentle buzz of Summer bees. The warmth of Rose against me is heavenly and she moves her hands through my brown hair. My green eyes gazing into hers, I look at her soft milky skin and fiery red hair.
You can’t say that I’m not handy. If I put my mind to it, I can pretty much do whatever needs to be done. But that’s the thing; it really needs to be done. I don’t go round the house searching for things to improve. If you were to show me a bathtub that holds water, I would say that was one fine bathtub. Show the same tub to Paul and he would find eighty seven things about it that need to be fixed; things like the yellow caulking or the rust spots or the gouges on the bottom of the tub that make it look like a desperate dog in need of a pedicure was trapped in it for a weekend; cosmetic things. Are you able to wash yourself in it? Alrighty then.
As I was falling asleep Friday night, Mr. Mom rubbed my back and asked me what I was thinking about.
# 1,5: Julie Kagawa – Winter’s Passage
Joan Crawford, actress. “Robert Taylor will always remain one of the beautiful people in my life. Wayne, p. 50
What the fuck did he think would happen?
Seven, seven; grace and love
Falling asleep to Shin Chan DVDs is pretty cool! ...until they affect your dreams. Had one dream where I met up with an old friend of the past and they talked exactly like Shin. Creepy.
Now a little bit about The Shabby Nest: I started writing this blog as a creative outlet. And now The Shabby Nest has evolved into my very own little corner of the blogosphere where I share my love of home decor, and DIY projects, with entertaining and a little bit of style thrown in for good measure. This year The Shabby Nest was chosen by Country Living Magazine as the Best Decorating Blog of 2011 in their first annual Blue Ribbon Blogger Awards.
11. When a Man Loves a Woman - Enhanced Multimedia Edition by Alina Adams - Can a man and woman ever truly be just friends? What about if one of them is married? What if one of them suddenly isn't anymore?
Without further ado, here’s my top 100 Beatles songs, nos. 1-10.
Monday we are taking the day off to take Aurora to Disneyland for her birthday. We are excited to see the joy of the park through her eyes. She has never been before, so it will be a really special treat. We are also taking away the pacifier - Disneyland is supposed to be the consolation prize. Upon the suggestion of my dear friend (who is also the manager of a dental office) it was time to give up the paci, and the perfect story to go with it: The paci fairy is coming to take all the pacifiers from you to bring them to all the other little babies who dont have any at all. Venissa also got Aurora a soft Ariel doll for her birthday that she has really taken to and so we are hoping she can stand in to settle her when she is inconsolable. So when she goes to bed on Sunday night, we are going to help her get all her pacifiers together for the fairy then when she wakes up on Monday we go to Disneyland! Abby is teething (getting THREE top teeth all at once and they are coming in SLOWLY) so I hope she is not too fussy for our trip. And Ryan is already mapping out the bathrooms in the park since Aurora has been in panties during the day for a while now, and only gets diapers or pull ups at naptime and at night.
The median age of first marriage has also hit a new high, of 26.5 for brides and 28.7 for grooms.
This is an interest of mine, because I believe if the Divine is who He/She/It claims to be, then the Divine’s presence will be known when His/Her/Its creation gathers together for the purpose of knowing Him/Her/It and seeing the Divine in one-another.
INT. OUR HERO'S ONE BEDROOM IN EAST HOLLYWOOD/PARK SLOPE
1 daze
Have you ever put a book down because the main character was being stupid? I have - more than once. It's the sort of thing where I am going along, and then I see the main character make some decision that will bring on a lot of trouble, and I don't understand why he/she is doing it, and I can't put together any kind of mental logic for the character that will cause it to make sense. If it's the first time the character has done this, I won't throw the book across the room. But if it's too important to the plot, or if I've seen it happen more than once, I will. At very least, I'll set the thing down, at the risk of never picking it back up again.
Bubba: OK.
Not only that… I was stocking up on music that would have never likely been released, ever, anywhere if it weren’t for them being posted on blogs. Music that Spotify will never have. I found out about artists from California to Denmark to Japan thanks not to Spotify, but to my now antiquated method of rifling through numerous blogs for links to what I hoped would be great music. The hunt was the digital version of digging into vinyls in the back of the record store.
The other talk today was by one of the dads, Rem. He has recently moved from a life caught up in the corporate world, to a life running his own business from home. He quickly admitted that he has much to learn in terms of making that really work successfully, but he's certainly enjoying a greater level of involvement in family life, and a closer relationship with his kids. He talked about how most men live a life where "success" is very sequential. They go through school, get into the best uni possible, get the best job possible, work their way up the ranks and ta da! Success. They often see school and education in the same light: they seek out the "best school" for their kids, send them off and read the report cards. So for men who have wives that are strong enough to buck the system and keep their kids at home, and particularly for men whose wives are drawn to the unschooling philosophy, it can be a great challenge to accept this! He talked about the importance of finding a supportive unschooling community of friends. He also talked about how Dads can feel isolated and left behind even within their own family, and how it's really important for them to make the most of the opportunities they do have at home. He talked about a car trip they did where he had to make some business calls. He told the kids that either they could stop the car so he could talk on the side of the road in peace, or they could be quiet so he could talk while his wife kept driving. They decided to be quiet!! Then, when they got there, he still had more business calls to make, but by this time he was walking barefoot along the beach whilst talking.
“Cleanse ye your eyes, so that ye behold no man as different from yourselves. See ye no strangers; rather see all men as friends, for love and unity come hard when ye fix your gaze on otherness. And in this new and wondrous age, the Holy Writings say that we must be at one with every people; that we must see neither harshness nor injustice, neither malevolence, nor hostility, nor hate, but rather turn our eyes toward the heaven of ancient glory. For each of the creatures is a sign of God, and it was by the grace of the Lord and His power that each did step into the world; therefore they are not strangers, but in the family; not aliens, but friends, and to be treated as such.”
Davis: Well, sure. It’s exactly how Victorian social control over the slums was defined as a kind of hygienic project – or in the same way that urban segregation was justified in colonial cities as a problem of sanitation. Everywhere these discourses reinforce one another. What really has been lacking, however, is one big epidemic, originating in poverty, that hits the middle classes – because then you’ll see people really go berzerk. I think one of the most important facts about our world is that middle class people – above all, middle class Americans – have lived inside a historical bubble that really has no precedent in the rest of human history. For two, three, almost four, generations now, they have not personally experienced the cost of war, have not experienced epidemic disease – in other words, they have lived in an ever-increasing arc not only of personal affluence but of personal longevity and security from accidental death, war, disease, and so on. Now if that were abruptly to come to a halt – to be interrupted by a very bad event, like a pandemic, that begins killing some significant number of middle class Americans – then obviously all hell is going to break loose.
Above is a clip from the documentary that accompanied the release of I Just Wasn't Made For These Times. Brian is singing 'Orange Crate Art' by Van Dyke Parks. The song is the title track for the album they recorded together, also released in '95. Here's the finished article.
The Judge ruled that “if the applicant had been injured while playing a game of cards in her motel room she would be entitled to compensation” and the fact that the woman was engaged in sexual activity rather than some other lawful recreational activity while in her hotel room does not lead to any different result.
05-24 Sydney, Australia – Entertainment Centre *
fiesta with some very special highlights!
Cool Magic
The Bilderberg Society will be meeting in Virginia from Thursday May 31st to Sunday June 3rd. Since they own all governments in the West, I would urge activists both in the area and on the Internet to inform the Bilderbergers and the media that America is in imminent danger of ceasing to exist. The US has 25 nuclear power plants in the area of the New Madrid fault lines and 2 on active fault lines in California. If an earthquake cuts outside electric power to a nuclear power plant, the plant has no means to prevent a meltdown after the plant’s batteries run down in 4 to 8 hours. Diesel generators could be hooked up that might last a few weeks. If one of those quakes actually destroys the nuclear containment vessels, then we will have to immediately deal with one or more Fukushima level meltdowns. The New Madrid fault line had 4 major earthquakes in the space of 9 weeks 200 years ago while California has several fault lines which have not been active for over 100 years. If you have never personally experienced the power of an earthquake, please consider this: A 6.9 earthquake like the San Francisco quake of October 17, 1989 released the energy equivalent of 340 kilotons of TNT whereas an 8.35 quake releases 50 megatons.
Wow, I didn't even celebrate it last year and well, quite frankly it hasn't exactly been blog central for me the past year and a half, but hey, there's always a reason to celebrate. Especially as I'm trying to baby step my way back out there amongst the online stitchers.
Escape Plan Triangle Avatar – 4/3
I've been spending my times in writing a new children's book called The Boy Who Sneezed Cum but it's not gross because he doesn't eat it, just sneezes it and probably wipes it on his jeans or something.
5005 Duke Street
In the LDS Gospel, we believe that we lived before this life, as spirits, literal creations of Heavenly Parents. We also believe that we will have a life after this one, where eventually we will be reunited with a perfected form of the body we have in this life, to continue to progress to being like out Heavenly Mother and Father. We understand two very specific reasons for this mortality, and have quite a bit of speculation on other reasons for mortality.
Bells Oberon
February in Bradborough, with east winds blowing down the narrow streets from the rain-sodden moors, was even at the best of times a trying month. Three days before the meeting which he had arranged with Evans, Digby was in bed, with a bottle of cough medicine and the second volume of Motley’s “Dutch Republic” on the table by his side. Dawson was more than usually assiduous in his care.
Here I wanted to mix a citrus color with a neutral (I'm just SO into color these days). Also, wanted to bust out my new bottle of Lindy Stamp Gang Starburst Stain in Dark Chocolate Truffle. Love this color, it is very deep, rich and the perfect shade of luscious brown. I used it to paint the petals of the I Am Roses Puffy Daisies.
It was a blessing in disguise that the intense rains caused so many to clear the streets prior to the several winds ripping through the streets. That some much damage was cause an so few fatalities resulted (I one confirmed in Queens) is also amazing.
-Sprinkle with brown sugar to cover and bake about 1 hour, or until top is browned, cream is absorbed and potatoes are fork tender.
10/24 – Cobalt Café – Canoga Park, CA
If this is the case, then the ANC’s public statements that they did not pick him up in Libya, nor did they bring him back to South Africa, will thus be inaccurate and downright sneaky, but nevertheless truthful.
Performance:
The best bit about tonight was, as soon as I had run up the stairs to the bridge, there was lightning over Mt Coot-tha, and this continued for all the return run. Now, I was pretty sure my brother had said there was a great water fountain on the other side. There wasn't - it was just a dribble. The great water fountain is on this side.
The Eagle reports that the project will have private apartments, but also large communal areas including a dining room and kitchen (“for sharing occasional meals together”), a living room and game room, kids room, guest room for visitors, a workshop and tool room, and outdoor space.
This small quote is extremely significant. What it is saying supports Marx's contention. For co-operative production, a certain degree of development by workers is necessary, and the basis of that solidarity can arise from the workers defensive struggles through the Trades Unions. But, this can never be enough. As Marx puts it in his criticism of Lassalle, the workers themselves must WANT to establish such production, they must be committed to it. Lenin's mistake that he only realised too late, was that he assumed that because the workers formed Trades Unions, this meant that they would automatically turn this exhibition of collectivism and solidarity into a desire to exercise control over the means of production. All that was needed then was to seize the means of production, and make that possible. In reality, the majority showed no more desire to do that than participated in the Trades Unions, or even in the Workers Parties. For example, in the German SPD at its height, only a very small minority of members played an active part in its Branch meetings.
finely chopped pecans (for garnish)
I write for children, but I also write articles and short stories and a few longer pieces.
First let me say, what an amazing company. The business model is unlike any other real estate firm in the nation, where the brokers themselves are the shareholders who are also the managers. It creates an alignment of interest that doesn’t exist in a typical publically-traded brokerage houses. At one point it was described by the COO as the “New York Yankees” of CRE companies because the attractive commission split allowed for the attraction of top talent in each market.
KB Swings (52/35)
After independence in 1947 Indian government adopted “land acquisition act-1894” as a tool for land acquisition.
Maybe this year’s Rainiers are really good at rubber matches? There’s a chance for another one against Las Vegas at the very end of June. Hold your breath…
94. Shades - Marguerite Poland
Enjoy the chicken 65!!
In the hospital, Britten watches as Santoro's ex-husband and daughter come to visit her.
Is all that’s needed
I've personally never made it before because I've never had to! But with my mom no longer with us, I've been mulling over whether to give it a whirl.
I'm on strict bedrest, so I am only allowed to get up to go to the bathroom and to shower. So, I spend most of my day laying in that bed trying to keep myself entertained. I watch A LOT of Netflix and I've become quite addicted to crossword puzzles. I feel like it helps keep my brain sharp. I also try really hard to keep some sense of routine to my day. I get up pretty early (cause the nurses come in to take my vital signs) and I take a hot shower. Then I put on fresh clothes, blow dry my hair, and put on make-up. It may seem silly to some, but it makes me feel much more human. Once I've showered, I call room service and have my breakfast delivered. (The food isn't so bad!) Once I'm done eating, the nurse comes back in to monitor me. This happens twice a day. Basically what they are doing is monitoring the babies' heart rates and also checking to see if I am having any regular contractions.
Now mix the lot together!
Here is a closer look at our RD venue:
On May 20, march with veterans and GIs, students and youth from across the country, union members and community organizations to say no to the war machine!
112 Baby Fox Jonny Lipshake (The 360° Drunken Master Soundboy Special)
I’ll tell you what the fucking dog is thinking. The FUCKING DOG is eyeing up your bacon sandwich. He’s wondering where he can next take a shit. He’s thinking about chewing on the pigeon rotting in the garden. He’s not thinking like a human.
When we give, our heart gets into the picture and that’s what makes the whole package more meaningful, more beautiful.
The power of the dog nose can also help them find that wrapped box of chocolates under the Christmas tree or hidden away for Valentine's Day. I know one Beagle who learned to open the pantry, and he loved to eat the brownie mix.
What am I willing to change about myself to achieve my goals?
Which purportedly covers at least ten million more people, without adding a single new doctor, but provides for 16,000 new IRS agents, written by a committee whose chairman says he doesn’t understand it, passed by a Congress that didn’t read it, but exempted themselves from it, and signed by a Dumbo President who smokes, with funding administered by a treasury chief who didn’t pay his taxes, for which we’ll be taxed for four years before any benefits take effect, by a government which has already bankrupted Social Security and Medicare, all to be overseen by a surgeon general who is obese, and financed by a country that’s broke!!
With the ever frothing-at-the mouth Judea Pearl and another equally towering intellectual, Steve Kroft. Check the pdf.
Driver arrests
Yancey is a best-selling author of many books including, What Good is God? and Prayer: Does it Make a Difference?
Yesterday I took delivery of my shiny, new blocking board, which is a bit of foam with fabric on the top with centimetre squares on it. I am happy with it though, but need more pins as I have all those squares I did on holiday to block and can only pin out three at a time. I'm dying to get that sewn together and edged to prove to myself that I can actually finish something and not just keep crocheting aimlessly and buying wool like it is going on the ration. (The wool shop had a sale.. of course I had to go in there twice in one day... anyone would...)
First of all i would like to thank for those of you that wished me a speedy recovery from my allergy attack last week. Although it wasn't so serious that i need to call 911, but it was serious enough that i was on allergy medication for quite a few days upon 'till early this week until the symptoms were completely gone. And since many asked me, my appointment with the allergy specialist is next week, so i'll know what i'm allergic too then, and avoid those things in the future to prevent stuff like this happen again.
I made a silly mistake last time I was in America and forgot to pack my hiking shoes. I didn’t discover this until I was looking for them to pack for this trip, so the best shoes I had for the job were my runners. They’re okay, but don’t provide any ankle support and lack the gripping power of real hiking shoes. Oh, well.
Consider getting an ally in the suspicious virtual world. For sure this buddy will not betray you given its complete fidelity along with advanced integrated features and functions. Perhaps you are now curious what I am talking about so allow me to introduce to you Plantronics GameCom 777 Surround Sound Gaming Headset with Dolby Technology.
Social networks really aren’t that new. Many recognize the Website SixDegrees.com, launched in late 1997, as the first social network site.[1] SixDegrees allowed users to create profiles, list their Friends and surf the Friends’ lists.
So, I've taken a lover... Myself. And, I vow to love myself warts and all and find my true, authentic self no matter the consequences to my existing relationships because the most important relationship is the one I have with me, whoever she may be.
The young girl’s father had been assigned to accompany the family there. John’s Royal Guard duties, likewise, also called him there. It was not coincidence that they would spend summer months together.
Insurgent picks up right where Divergent left off. It continues much in the way that Divergent did, following Tris as she battles with her disintegrating world. Just like with Divergent, I enjoyed the world and the symbolism surrounding human nature being forced into five different factions and how the city reacts to those refusing to be molded. However, the polish wore off in the sequel. Tris's character was almost unbearable to me--I could barely keep myself from throwing the book across the room at her constant stupidity. The plot was chaotic. The romance was irritating. The goal was lost on me. Overall, not a promising second installment.
The hard fact is, however, that I am writing this note on a laptop, using a paperless word processor with built-in headmaster for checking spelling and grammar, connected to a virtual sea of information through the WIFI at Butler’s Chocolate Café at Jinnah International Airport, Karachi.
return to your home, go about
Bossypants by Tina Fey. Can't wait to read this!
March 3rd - Celebratory Picnic in Teignbridge.
I could not help but stop on a cold and windy day to take a closer look, I imagined the history of the farmhouse and wondered on her beginnings. It was clear that restoration work had started some years ago but that it had rudely stopped mid stream. The shutters were falling from their hinges, the doors had long disappeared and the Starlings were the only creatures in residence. I could see that repairs had started on the roof yet the massive crane in pride of place had rusted over and building materials were half buried in the over-grown weeds. As I peered through the padlocked gates I remembered my own Provencal journey. I am happy that I am not contemplating restoration and I am even more than happy to know that my cosy farmhouse is waiting for me at the end of the day but I would be less than honest if I didn't admit to a few sparks of interest and stomach turns when I saw this French farmhouse.
In terms of costs the left-behind parent may incur, if the parent opts to retain a private attorney, he/she would be responsible for those costs. There may also be costs associated with travel to the hearing and picking up the children. Sometimes, the parent’s attorney is able to recoup those costs from the taking parent by petitioning the court.
It is synchronous at the height of summer, therefore, that several new crop circles should appear – in wildly different locations (not all in the ‘expected’ environs of Wiltshire) – which ask us to reexamine and appreciate our ancestral landscapes, remember our most ancient beliefs.
While I am on the GBA subject I will quickly address Mother 1+2, this game would have made the most sense of any other Mother title. Mother and Earthbound had both already been localized and porting the games to GBA would have only taken weeks for a small TreeHouse team. Being released in 2003 alongside its Japanese counterpart would have been a smart decision and fairly low risk. Though the impending launch of the DS and a pricey marketing campaign would have still marred the localization process.
Welcome to the 9th week of JustRite Stampers’ Wednesday feature, 12 Weeks of Christmas Blog Hops! Every Wednesday up until Thanksgiving some of your favorite designers will be joining some of the JustRite design team for a series of Christmas blog hops, showcasing JustRite’s entire Christmas Collection of stamps! Don’t forget that JustRite has some Christmas stamps in their newly released CLING line of stamp sets, too -- you can find them HERE. This week, the designers joining the JustRite design team is the Just Us Girls (JUGS) challenge blog design team!
A theatre.
My favorite moment of the morning is when I settle into our big chair, Sam's and mine, my hands around the hot mug, soft cover over my legs, Sampson burrowing into me and relaxing as if God is in his Heaven and all is right with the world. I have finally taken my place in the chair and our day begins in earnest. I look around me at dogs sleeping once more, the sun shining in the windows, and the wild birds tapping against the window feeders. Greeted by a chickadee I begin my day.
It is the time of year where I am busy giving lectures and demonstrations on how to keep yourselves and your loved ones safe when around water, because as a police diver ( PSD) it is not just about the recovery of evidence from the water, or to bring closure to families by bringing their loved ones " home", it is my job to educate the public on how to avoid situations where tragedy may strike.
Brand: Aastra
The biographical approach I am taking is meant to flesh out exactly what these definitions mean to me. How did I come to find the music I love so much and that I choose to make available to anyone in the world who wants to listen to The Pure Pop Pub? When you think about it, just putting this radio station on the air is an act of almost unimaginable egotism only made palatable (some could argue) by the fact it is free. But these days most every committed music fan is in may ways a disc jockey. Sure they may be spinning tunes for only themselves or a few friends for whom they make mix discs, but that is every bit as much an expression of their personal musical biography as my scribblings here.
And feel free to curse. You can write “FUCK.” Not “Fu*k”
Thanks for stopping in...
I watched Law & Order, the "SUV" edition of NBC's long running multi-generational cop ensemble and they did Williamsburg tonight.
“Was all day with Vince at the park, kissed me, watched TV, went to Vince’s bed.”
multiple values Typically rhythmic-melodic speech in a hebephrenic schizophrenic; Ecstatically emotive artificial language in a chronic paranoid; Sonorous artificial language (Schizophrenia); Sitting with 'Betty', rec. London, 1987
Ibis noted Bantum returning to the front of the cave talking to his chicken. He had been sitting there going over the details of his plans for the short-range future. He wanted to ensure that he would have enough energy available in the morning to use his mystic power to influence the magistrate when he met with him. However, he was quite low on energy, and so he decided against working with Korfu that night, other than to chat with him. Korfu, because he had become accustomed to his nightly Emotion Control Training with Ibis, was upset about this, despite Ibis’ explanation that it was now time for him to begin exercising emotional control on his own. Korfu felt crestfallen, but recognized that he needed to begin to control his own emotions, so he tried his best to curtail his anxiety. He sneezed, and was tired, and a bit skittish and decided to go to sleep.
a little bit candles on the left cut out with the CC cutters Candle border die
I'll start with the veggie garden, because right now, I'm waiting for the last of my pepper plants to get bigger, and then I'm DONE planting in it for now.
26 human
The police found the bodies of Filip Slavkovski, Aleksandar Nakjevski, Cvetanco Acevski, Kire Trickovski and Borce Stevkovski at what looked like an execution scene.
“Hello,” I, I mean the other me, said.
2. ‘Blueprint’ seems to take up musically exactly where ‘Windchase’ left off. Was it a conscious decision to eschew more current prog-metal flavours and adhere to the classic Sebastian Hardie sound?
Something I plan to do to correct this issue is ‘house yoga’. Every woman here loves yoga, so we’re going to try to do that, even though we haven’t yet. We’ve talked about it and that’s a start!
COINCIDENCES: (What Happens In Vegas, The Proposal) 2 movies in the same night that had sham marriages that the authorities were investigating, as well as a scene with people listening to headphones while taking a bath/shower, and not being able to hear what is going on.
and are not good but I promised pics.
I leave the window open. Bunched shadows
My grandfather carefully reeled in the trout and having landed it, removed the hook from it and put it into the bag he used to store his catch.
...which is also a big droney drone of a song. Some plinks, some plonks, a little Jónsi
With incredible compassion for those being exploited, tortured and killed, this film recounts some of their stories and exposes this horrific injustice for what it is – the battlefront of the 21st century.
Lately, in addition to being pumped about wonton’s big debut, I’m also pumped about getting my body back to normal. I don’t just mean “I want to be like Angelina and lose the baby weight fast,” because I think that will all come in time and I’m not to worried about it. I’m talking about other, more random things that nobody ever reads about in People Magazine. I want my fingers to work like normal. I want to be able to hold a pen again. I want my wedding rings to fit on my fingers again, and I look forward to a time when my extremities no longer expand four sizes just from walking downtown. I’m looking forward to high heels and pencil skirts. I want to be able to walk up a hill without stopping half way or losing my breath. I want to be able to sit on the toilet without having to navigate the throne in a special way. I want to be able to shave my legs without running out of breath, and I look forward to being able to paint my toenails again.
The political side of modern Illluminism is a lot more visible and its plans are obvious. An increasingly restrictive and concentrated group is being entrusted with the creation of important decisions and policies. International committees and organizations, acting above elected officials are today creating social and economic policies that are applied on a global level. This phenomenon is rather new in world history as a rather than kingdoms or nation-states, a non-elected shadow government, composed of the world’s elite, is gradually becoming the center of world power.
The taxi driver had a difficult time finding the hotel, even with the address. We got to the general area in only about 15 minutes but spent a good 20 minutes driving up and down streets, asking other drivers, and calling the hotel for directions. Finally, we found it. I tipped the driver about 30% over the meter price, and he looked at me like I was crazy. "But we drove so long!" he exclaimed. "But the meter never lies!" I said back. And I walked into the hotel.
But that's exactly the point. Unless poets are stumped by the form, unless they are forced to look beyond the obvious associations, they'll never invent an original line. They'll be stuck with clichés and conventions, with predictable adjectives and boring verbs. And this is why poetic forms are so important.
or lead a merry dance, entrance you
Snowy Morning
For every “right” thing that Toby tries to do, something goes awry and he becomes more embroiled in other people’s evil plots and plans. It soon becomes clear that the underlying theme of this story is that sometimes even good people have to do bad things in order to ensure their survival and, more particularly, the survival of those whom they love.
Whew - all is well there now.
Milwaukee 6955-20 Review – Is This Compound Miter Saw What You Need?
4. I have self diagnosed ADHD. (Well, I use it as an excuse)
4: You have been given an ungodly amount of money, and total control of a major motion picture studio - what would your dream Horror project be?
Prewash all fabrics (gentle cycle will help prevent fraying).
So your a developer working on a 200-million dollar game. Well you can break the game into four pieces. You make a 50- million dollar episode and sell it online for 29.99$. If the episode bombs a developer can drop the product without risking a massive loss at retail.
Cena gets on the mic, and he tells us this Sunday, ADR’s destiny changes, because The Champ is Here.
In other words, Newt was picking up on a concern, prominent in the day and voiced by no less than Reagan’s then ex-UN Ambassador Kirkpatrick, not to mention prominent Reagan supporters Will and Kristol and the late-Mondale aide turned conservative Krauthammer, that Reagan’s anti-Communist policies could be stronger if better institutionalized and not tied as much to the Reagan persona. The entire speech focused on suggestions of how to do just that — to effectively institutionalize Reagan’s conservative beliefs in the government. Is Abrams seriously accusing Jeane Kirkpatrick and George Will of being anti-Reagan? Of spewing “insulting rhetoric” at a president everyone in Washington knew they staunchly supported? Really? Of course not. But in apparent service to the Romney campaign, in order to make Newt Gingrich appear to be doing just that, Abrams apparently quite deliberately cut out the original Gingrich reference to Will, Kirkpatrick, Krauthammer, and Kristol.
It was me. She said my name aloud
Next time we’ll go to Hagan. Or what’s left of it.
276 **5. “Individualism, Professional Ethics, and the Sense of Community: From Runnymede to a London Telephone Booth.” Loyola University of Chicago Law Journal, vol. 28, pp. 285-331 (1996). (Sources: Items D-IX/11/1996, D-V/3/1993, D-IX/15(A)/1995, D-XI/21/1987, D-IX/10/1996, D-IX/30/1996, D-IX/24/1996, and D-III/26/1995, below.)
He delivered one sharp slap to my pussy and I cried out in pain.
In Prized, you can expect Gaia to struggle so much with her beliefs, against an unstoppable power that she finds both unflappable and disconcerting. Some of her decisions lead to much irritating-to-read strife, but that's how people learn.
I didn't think or pray or worry about work, my job, my boss, or my career the entire time I was there. Even when someone asked me what I do for a living... the stress and anxiety about my work situation wasn't present. I just answered and moved on.
We have a new addition to the yard this year. A couple of Kildares have decided to call us home.
13And I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Write, Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord from henceforth: Yea, saith the Spirit, that they may rest from their labours; and their works do follow them.
It would seem that those who speak the same language want to engage in, with and be part of what everyone else is doing. That means we congregate where everyone else is. So the sharing of the gospel becomes a rather simpler job. The American Linguistic Association states that we will lose 6,000 languages by 2020.
Topics you’ll see….
The real excitement, although only 1.5 miles, was the pace. A 9:38 pace will translate to a very respectable showing in a 5K. I’ll have to work out the times when I start running around the neighborhood. Tomorrow will be a 2.5 mile run, Thursday will be another 1.5 and leg workout, and Friday will be, if all goes well, five miles! The goal there is to finish under an hour.
His publisher has presented The 3rd Alternative as a wholly fresh work. But this is slightly misleading. What this is, in actuality, is a well-penned and timely rehash of the book that made his name, thanks to its ground-breaking focus on the importance of synergy and on the win-win paradigm.
Toss snap peas with potatoes and remaining 1/2 tsp salt; divide evenly among packets.
For when I am lost, and alone,
In keeping with the spirit of La Fete de la Musique, the event was free for the lucky 5000 revellers who managed to download a ticket before they ran out. Once inside, the mixed crowd, reduced to tiny dots in the enormity of the space, congregated between one of the three arms of the bulbous sculpture and Hawtin (also known by the name Plastikman) who presided over the masses from up high on the balcony.
2. I love the idea of the name, and completely agree—the world is getting smaller. How does music uniquely position you all to celebrate the opportunities provided by the world being a smaller place?
Voltaire
i'm praying that we don't rest on our victory in the days and weeks following this. and i pray for the safety of everyone serving in the military. mostly, right now, i am asking for peace of mind.
I've decided to only do one show this year.
I hope this was helpful and as always we welcome any feedback or comments.
I want to be free. I want to hear Your voice,
In Philippians 2:5-11, I find my statement of faith—an incredible summary of what I believe about Christ’s birth, life, death, burial, resurrection, ascension, and eternal glory.
I’ve got this one life
Anyway, while I was snowed in, Susan Marlowe managed to keep herself occupied. I have been catching up on movies that I missed over the past year or so. I have also been painting. A few acrylic studies of the snowfall.
Whether advance payment of royalties is included.
When pressed, the acura integra 87 as much as 6000 degrees. The exhaust system can add increased power and subsequently 100% of that to the oem acura integra wheels of the oem acura integra wheels and irritated after a while. It was probably just a slip up, as the oem acura integra wheels. The only negative thing people had to say was about the acura integra specifications with high-spirited handling qualities, engineers managed to retain ride comfort beyond what the oem acura integra wheels and we're asking for more and more comfortable than its predecessor, the 2009 TL has been Acura's best-selling vehicle since then at roughly 76,000 U.S. units annually.
We dressed Zan in our clothes, and fed him our food, and let him sleep in our beds. We told him to call us Mom and Dad and brother.
Shaw GM, Wasserman CR, O’Malley CD, Nelson V, Jackson RJ. Maternal pesticide exposure from multiple sources and selected congenital anomalies. Epidemiology 1999; 10: 60-66.
This is like seeing double for me....
The news wasn’t entirely bad for home resales, however. Although total home units sold decreased, so did the number of homes available for sale. There were just 2.37 million homes for sale nationwide in March, a 2 percent drop from the month prior.
UPDATE: In addition, if Mr. Sherman mentioned that he'd be willing to read more of your entry, feel free to query him at brooks(at)fineprintlit(dot)com with a REVISED query and the first 5 pages of your manuscript. With any luck, a few more of these contest entries will turn into requests!
And me.
I am no shape or form in ready for a bathing suit this early haha, but whatever…I will keep doing what I do best…be busy.
I would love your feedback before I finalize the book. I know my current menu is pretty "clean" but it does have the occasional canned soup or packaged corn bread mix. This one will use whole foods.
get her in the bed
Wagner said his department's review of Solutions 21's corporate documents and the Western regional director's statements of financial interest found no evidence to contradict her statements. The report notes that the investigators' ability to determine the substance of communications between a married couple is obviously limited.So what we have here is a contract let by the PLCB, to a company run by the husband of a high-level PLCB manager (who has no financial interest in the company, but...she's married to the guy, so you gotta figure she's got a financial interest in that), and that's legal because she told the auditor general that she and her husband had agreed not to discuss the RFP. Great! Good ethics laws we have, and I feel good about that!
Your passions may not look like anyone else’s. They may not be understandable or relevant to anyone but you. They may not be “important” or profitable, or marketable. They may reveal themselves to you slowly, like one of those pills you put in water that take forever to expand into Christmas tree. It may take some prodding, and some additional hot water. You may have to put up with patronizing, doubtful people who wish they had to courage to pursue passions of their own.
Lately I've wondered whether any choice is "right" in these situations. What is a measure of having done it right?
The official event announcement says the URI Botanical Gardens will be selling plants at the Greenhouse on Friday May 4th, Saturday May 5th and Friday May 11th. What it doesn’t say is how many beautiful plants of all kinds will be available!
I opened up the mail today and there was a perfume insert in a small catalog to a local department store. It was Jennifer Aniston’s perfume.
It’s not the destination’s fault you arrived there with a misconstrued idea of what the place must have been, based on images and tales from others. The place is what it is, and it is us who have to be open minded to enjoy it or not based on its real current characteristics.
Thank you all for your well wishes about my illness. I really appreciate it!
Under the Mistletoe ... Lifetime ... 8 PM
Gladstone's March, 1857 parliamentary speech denouncing Palmerston's aggression towards China helped bring down the government. Ironically, this ended up helping Palmerston, since many of advocates for a more pacific foreign policy were defeated in the subsequent elections.
I realized then that I didn’t get it at all. I wasn’t comprehending the significance of my morning. I needed to ponder, really reach into what I was hearing.
Today there was a bit of a street fight. FAITH and self doubt were mixing it up on Adams Blvd between Arlington and 10th Ave., I got hit ...a few times...but I was not knocked out.
Though we get sad to see them fall
As quickly as the burst of energy erupts, it is dispersed into the fresh New Year air. The die-hards among the crowd are atop the stairs and I find myself being hearded with them toward the entrance to the bell's housing. Military men are barking at the crowd and push/pulling them through the roped-off entrance eight at a time.
Instead I'll just wish everyone good luck. And if for some reason those judges can't see the brilliance in your ad, don't sweat it.
Now for the dangerous part, cue danger music.
Karin Slaughter to be awarded the 2011 Silver Bullet Award for her “Save the Libraries” program.
Total: 2 servings, 500 cal, 250 cal / serving
Sew-Alongers, we're one week away from our starting date so make sure there's plenty of wood in the woodpile and cookies in the fridge...we're gonna need 'em! Do you have your fabric, your pattern... a sewing machine?
I asked, "How do you know?"
a. A scam
Not as much as you’d think. There have been changes for sure, but more in the time management area than anything else. However, the first year did go differently than the second year. Not all of it was what I expected, and some of it I wished I’d been better prepared for.
The Institute prepares both macropathological and micropathological material for itself and for use by requesting organizations of the Armed Forces. While the Institute does not prepare material for sale, it does have a training program in the technique of preparation and mounting of gross material in which accepted students may learn modern gross mounting methods.
Fellow team-member Kitty Pryde, who has served beside him for years, says:
Turning over to the ETF universe, we see the same trends reflected in the data. According to Lipper FMI fund flow data, junk bond ETFs lost $484.2 million for the week ended Wednesday – a new record. Two major ETFs accounted for the bulk of the outflow: iShares iBoxx High Yield Corporate Bond (HYG) lost $269 million and the SPDR Barclays High Yield Bond (JNK) suffered $245.3 million in redemptions.
Legend has it that it is used to help with: being able to thinking positively, protection and wise thinking, and balance and opening one to be able to accept Love ♥
i love helping out at sydney's school.
The earrings are ones I rarely wear because they're a bit heavy.
So that let's biology off the hook, in terms of my bronchiectasis at least, which is not in any way genetic.
400ml chicken stock (I used Heston’s from Waitrose, which is excellent)
2 cans cream corn
Mignon Faget’s High Note collection is available in Mignon Faget galleries in New Orleans and Baton Rouge and online at http://www.mignonfaget.com/.
None of the specified assets 17.8%
One common criticism is that L1 can’t be used in multilingual classes, but a quick show of hands immediately showed us that monolingual classes are in fact the majority.
Michael John LaChiusa, Spike Lee and Lawrence Hill because I have a bunch of projects that I would like to discuss with them:)
So why do it?
I used to keep our pots and pans in a typical kitchen cabinet, however, I found they were nearly impossible to get in and out without wanting to quit cooking before I even started, so they found a new home in the spinning lazy susan, which makes them SO much easier to find and grab! There is never harm in switching things up when something isn't working for you!
I've been doing some sewing the last two days,
Our media (“too posh to push”) and our politicians (“we must save the NHS!”) are utterly divorced from the complicated, technical realities of that debate. If we are lucky, one or other might focus in on the details set out above. If it’s a blue moon, one or other might bother to question whether the additional cost arising from the new NICE guidance is justified by the small incremental benefit that might accrue. If the stars are in alignment, you might see them exploring whether there are other, more cost effective way to achieve the same benefits.
Rating: Eight of Ten Stars
Many adolescents do not fare so well, dropping out of high school because their dyslexia or learning difficulty has not been identified. Even if it is recognised, the school is often unable to meet the students' needs for a more individualised program and for mentoring. Such students find language learning difficult, whether it is understanding and using spoken language or learning to read, write and spell.
sweater - target
I'm getting better, or else I couldn't have done this post, and I hope to be back soon, but I won't risk anything by starting too early.
Session 2, OFF-campus (tuition & partial board – breakfast & lunch): $1875
1 package of active dry yeast (1/4 ounce)
“No,” I heard him say gruffly.
Little did I know that 2003 would bring enlightenment and possibility of cheese entering my life? Not just everyday, ordinary cheese but delicious and exciting creations with depths of flavor that burst upon your tongue and mouth. Each small piece a representation of the Cheesemaker who took milk and turned it into a wonderful palette pleasing sensation.
8. Refrigerate unused embutido.
Portable displays are available as roller banners, tension fabric displays, pop-up systems, display plinth, modular displays and many other niche display types.
It took us no time at all to pick out a new top-loading washer from the back of the store--that's where they keep the ones with agitators and manual water-level settings. These tend to cost more, and in fact we bought one of the better models--all stainless steel, a great warranty, made right here in the Midwestern US of A.
But that frame became the skin of a queen
I don't keep a traditional "art journal" as such, but tend to rip half sheets of watercolour paper and collage over them in the 'wee small' hours of the night. They then get signed and dated and added to an ever growing collection of pages which I keep in handmade covers. It makes for an interesting hour or three when I pull them off the shelf and peruse!
I'm going to be spending a Friday and Saturday with some friends at a women's conference in Long Beach. Time Out For Women. The ladies I'm going with all went last year (to Fresno!) and loved it so much they decided to go every year, and this year I got an invite. As with all things that disrupt my safe little routine, I was very excited to be invited and to attend, but now that it's tomorrow, I'm having my usual neurotic doubts and misgivings. What if my ankle acts up, what if I'm achey all weekend? What if I just want to come home? What will they think when they find out how much I really hobble around at the end of the day? What if I'm no fun? You see how my mind runs.
GREASING MOULDS
The experience I had with you fine gentlemen reaffirms what I aways felt and believe in my heart. I Love living in Brooklyn. You two men are another pair of reasons why.
As I've noted, Poetry follows Mija, a 66 year old woman who makes her living as an occasional maid and lives with her no-account grandson. Her daughter is off in the city looking for work. As the movie opens, Mija is beginning to forget words. This is, unsurprisingly, the onset of Alzheimer's, a diagnosis that the movie confirms later. Her employer is a stroke victim who makes sexual advances toward her, though these advances aren't entirely unwelcome. Mija's grandson has been identified as one of a group of kids who raped a girl who then jumped off a bridge. On her initial visit to the hospital at the beginning of the movie, Mija sees the girl's body arrive, along with her inconsolable family. The girl haunts Mija for the entire film, and as she looks for beauty around which to organize the poem she wants to write, she is stymied at every turn by the sheer ugliness of life around her. Finding poetry within this, it turns out, is the mission of the movie, and it builds to a haunting conclusion.
d. Who
Should you be worried about taking ibuprofen or acetaminophen for soreness after a good workout or training session? Yes. After all, they’re drugs and some studies show that when used for this purpose they aren’t even effective.
And then, almost before I know it, we've said our last words and we're lining up for our curtain call. Our first performance is over, the audience is clapping loudly, and their applause continues as we make our way off stage.
Diego Leclery
gradually in Sanctification BECAUSE HE PERFECTLY FOLLOWED THE LAW OF GOD WHICH
ANSWER: DELIVERY.
Meghan (4 years 4 months), Jack (7 years 8 months): Meghan was not enthused by the prospect of actually touching stingrays in the travelling exhibit at the Saint Louis Zoo. Said she, “Jack can tell me about it.” (#447)
As we walk through the neighborhood, however
RIP Aunt Jackie and Uncle George
Me:”If you could be one animal what one animal would you be?
Batplane Returns. Whether live-action or animated, nine out of every ten Batplane appearances follow the same pattern: Batman flies somewhere he would normally drive. He activates one or two weapons. He fails to win. Sooner or later, it explodes. Spread across his appearances in various media, Bruce Wayne by now has spent hundreds of billions on single-use disposable Batplanes. The Nolan version looks sleeker than most previous versions, but is doubtlessly just as fragile.
We are gravely disappointed that the Star opted NOT to contact any of us on the funeral committee to give our side of the story and react to these putrid and sordid insinuations.
About 30 people arrived at the Tan Hill Inn in North Yorkshire on New Year's Eve to welcome in 2010.
As far as almond flour goes, and you can either make it yourself or buy store bought. I always buy JK Gourmet brand because I like its texture.
Adventurers from the Holy Roman Empire speak German, a Germanic language (no, really?) related to English and Scandinavian.
Locals can be serious about their spargel. It is evident in local farms where there are rows of spargel grown carefully under cover and underground in the soil with harvest from May to June. At German local farmers’ markets, the spargel were graded and priced according to their level of freshness. Spears plucked a few hours earlier that day and if spears were unbroken, they were more expensive.
Happy New Year....WOW....how fast it came this year. OK who am I kidding I say that every year! There never seems to be enough time in a day to do all that I NEED to do and all that I WANT to do. But since my sweet husband is snoring and sleep has eluded me once again I will use this quiet time to share with you some of my favorite things from 2010.
This is the sketch for this week's Willow Sketchie Challenge which has been set by the lovely Claire and if you pop over to our blog there is some fab inspiration.
a lookout to shout "land ahoy"...
The leaves, Alexi Levin (on keyboards, accordion, mouth harp and reeds) and Vladimir Volkov (double-bass) are Russian jazz players. New to the mix is Sandip Bhattacharya, Indian tabla player and singer. Sami artist Mari Boine joins on one especially jazzy track, as does Sergey Starostin on another (singing in Old Russian). I miss the heavy Tuvan flavor of their last album, but there are still musical echoes from the Siberian steppes. (Throat-singer Kaigal-ool Khovalyg is still associated with the band, toured with them recently, but is not on these sessions.)
One final thing (I can’t say too much now – maybe more later): I’ve learned that I work with some people who aren’t exceptionally good communicators. I had been told by professors that kicking students out of the classroom was often a sign to administrators that you couldn’t control your classroom, so I kept students in the classroom and things got out of hand. When I talked to veteran teachers, their advice way into the year: “Kick them out on the first day they act up. You won’t get any guff about it from anyone.” Had I known this earlier in the year, I might have saved myself a lot of headache. So one very simple lesson I’ve learned is to ask questions and find reliable sources who will provide guidance – and it seems like I’ve got a lot of good stuff in that regard.
What exactly did he mean? He did not elaborate, at least not in the class session that I attended that day. Ever since that I encounter, I have sought to try and work it my mind what the term might mean in the IP context.
if i can go back to the past, i would give my noob self a good flying kick!
Learning physical self defense helps most children become more confident, even if they never have to use these skills in a real-life situation. Just being more confident helps children to avoid being chosen as a victim most of the time. There are different self defense techniques for bullying than for more dangerous situations -- let your child practice a self defense move like kicking someone in the shins, pinching someone's leg or upper arm, or hitting someone in the chest. You can practice in the air or by holding a sofa cushion. Consider sending your child to a class!!!
7. Popeye’s Rip’n Chick’n
If you like to make stylish cards really fast, then why not come and see what I've made for Three Minute Thursday tomorrow? Hope to see you then,
But Sharshar was right. Nibras had no choice but to acquiesce. He had never thought he’d see himself in such an impossible situation in a life that, otherwise, was as plain and clear as the conscience of a blue sky on a sunny day...
but i am grateful for this weather. i am so grateful for a mild winter. this winter we came into prepared enough but not completely comfortable with the housing and pens we had set up for the animals. neither of us were totally sure how things would work out. and now because of the lack of snow our chickens are still able to go outside. bella has been able to spend all but a handful of nights sleeping at the mouth of the pigs' hut. we haven't had any problems with frostbite on the roosters' combs. we haven't had to visit the farm in the middle of the night to stoke the woodstove.
Lately I've been caught up in music a lot. Live music. I always have music playing. And recently a few of my poems have been set to music, the first in February by my friend April Lindfors and then recently two more by Canadian folk musicians including well known Newfoundland entertainer, Terry Rielly. Whether they will be recorded is yet to be seen but I love that my poetry is considered good enough to be made into a song and it's particularly gratifying since I have no particular musical skills at all. I do have a deep love for music though, and I guess, being a poet, a great admiration for great songwriting specifically.
O'er the bounds of thirty-five.
None of this. Absolutely none of this will be thought through.
Lost love taps at my door to speak but only hears
Annually we welcome over 100 students from all over the world to train with our outstanding faculty of tutors – we even have students coming from India as these opportunities aren’t available anywhere else.
We were on our way to my husband’s parent’s house for a day of swimming and over-indulgence. My In-Laws lived across town. They built a huge swimming pool, after their children were grown and gone; much to the dismay of the adult children. The grand-children loved to go over to Grandpa and Grandma’s house for the thrill of sliding down the pool slide and Daddy throwing them in the pool.
I remember reading about retirement savings like this: Take two individuals, and we'll call them Jim and Bob again. Jim saves $2000 a year in a retirement account from ages 19-26, and then he stops, because he wants to buy a house. Bob, on the other hand, doesn't start saving until he's 26. He puts in $2000 a year until he's 65. Guess who has more in the end? Jim. It's starting early that does it for you, because you have that extra time to earn more return.
Three very different worlds: the poignant psychic and geographical spaces of Neil Campbell's loners and misfits, the bright and brittle irony of Coupland's thirty-somethings in their sun-baked, contemporary-littered California, and the vivid, tactile yet mythic world of Vanessa Gebbie's Welsh Valleys town. Isn't it amazing what books can give you?
As an art group we are looking forward to working closely together to produce our thirty works. Last year on a painting retreat as an exercise and to relax and extend our expression we rotated small paintings around each member of the group to add their own marks. The paintings were often rotated around the group several times until a pleasing design and tonal balance was achieved. The result was a number of exciting abstract designs that were truly collaborative. During this challenge we are planning to extend this approach further introducing texture via collage and painting mediums to add an additional element of interest. Our group meets once a week and we will be completing all of our work during these sessions throughout May and June.
While training for races back in February and March I found myself thinking a lot about work and ideas I should explore. Occasionally I’d stop running and text myself a thought to follow up on. These distractions interrupted my focus, stopped me frequently, allowed only brief moments of “flow,” but on what I thought was a positive note I’d come home to a pile of running-inspired fascinating distractions. This seemed to make sense until I realized that I was interrupting my training, interrupting my work, and spending more time researching than getting my hands dirty. It was time to refresh my routine. It seems an obvious move now, but I made my running another form of meditation. What a great opportunity to focus on breathing! While running I acknowledged my distracting thoughts, thanked them, and let them go. I came back with a refreshed body, refreshed mind, and fewer distractions to pull me from my work. This realization was both refreshing and energizing.
-the Democrats want to hang on to this title badly. Can the Kings hold off the freight train known as Golatta and Daniel-San? Or will the ‘Foul Pole’ chop the Kings down to size?
The crowd was buzzing as the local band Damn Fine Gentlemen played their bluesy/roots tunes and continue to entertain during interludes between comedians. Comedian and MC for the night was Chris North who warmed the crowd up with some audience participation. North was kept on his toes throughout the night with a number of hecklers piping up.
It turned out AWESOME!!
#54- Kitchen Woodbox
The object of the game is for your little man to shoot his fingers up a fat woman’s arse and avoid her shit falling on him. Genius!
I hope you all had a wonderful weekend of celebrating the Resurrection of our Saviour. We had a wonderful time with family and friends as we participated in the many traditions of this celebration, beginning with a Passover meal on Friday and ending with a beautiful service on Sunday morning.
with packed pink linens
In a statement (pdf), the IPCC said the paragraph “refers to poorly substantiated estimates of rate of recession and date for the disappearance of Himalayan glaciers. In drafting the paragraph in question, the clear and well-established standards of evidence, required by the IPCC procedures, were not applied properly.”
B vitamins are also key to producing energy from nutrients that are consumed. Three members of this group—folic acid, pyridoxine, and cobalamin—work together to keep homocysteine levels low. This is quite important, since high homocysteine levels are associated with heart disease.
Some things about Kindle make me nervous in a sci-fi paranoia way (I'll post again on that later). But The Atlantic's move strikes me as cause for celebration. I don't like short stories, but I do enjoy reading them, and am happy to see someone giving writers some incentive to produce them.
That night at Uchi was many, many years ago, and I never bothered to go back again. Because if I am going to drop $200 on small portions of rolled up rice and little bits of fishy stuff, then I am going to stick with Musahino where the waitstaff might not qualify for friendly as a cuddly kitten, but their efficiency, in my experience, is... well, very efficient and certainly has never approached the reproachful manner of Uchi's Garcon Benetton K. Dick. (Aside: All that said, I still hear good things about Uchi and Uchiko, which I usually dismiss as hype, but occasionally I do get a little curious. So if any of you fine folk want to take me there and foot the bill to prove to me I'm wrong, I am open to the possibility-- message me privately.)
Funny how all year round nobody shows interest in doing the weekly shopping- let alone helping to pack it out!
This last weekend we all went camping up in East Tennessee in the Smoky Mountains. It was important that we do this now because:
cleaning (a little)
Gerard's:
On Christmas day we had several of Andrew's family members come over for dinner. We had the big celebration on Christmas Eve at my inlaws, then opened up our home on Sunday evening for anyone that was free to come. After dinner we were talking about family history...and Swedish immigrants :)...and we all had a good laugh when Andrew's grandfather shared a funny saying his father had developed when learning English. Whenever work on the farm or around the house resulted in the typical injuries that come with the territory he would tell his wife, "Uff da Clara, it hurts so good!" It was so funny to us because the idea of anything "hurting good" just doesn't sound right. But that's the way it is in adoption. There is a lot of hurt...for adoptive parents and adopted children...but it's all wrapped up in the growth of a family.
Yes. He did say that. Which is more than most candidates would have done. He did this, by the way, while your mother was slandering him at every opportunity, claiming that he "pals around with terrorists" and didn't really love America like the rest of us. He has more class in his little finger than your whole tacky family has in all their various appendages.
Spain, Germany and Denmark from time to time, and seasonal beers
In vials of ivory and coloured glass
He replied to me shortly after, in increasingly non-North American syntax, that this was all for real and that $1700.00 wired to his name via Western Union would enable him “to get myself out of this place.” The only thing missing was the ticking clock, a reference to some finite amount of time by which he had to pay some money or lose his airline ticket (or some other catastrophe). This, apparently, is often fixed at two to three hours.
(List up to 5 most recent press mentions. If it's something that you didn't scan, just pull the quote from the publication, list the publication name, writer's name, and date of publication. Like the bibliography information you used to do for college papers)
I looked carefully at her and understood that we were saved. At last we were absolutely safe and protected. This menacing snow had hidden us inside in the warmth for ever and we didn't have to worry a bit about what went on there outside. I was filled with enormous relief, and I shouted, “I love you, I LOVE YOU,” and took all the cushions and threw them at her and laughed and shouted and Mummy threw them all back, and in the end we were lying on the floor just laughing.
What attracts me to this trail is, of course, the obvious beauty of a footpath running through a built-up community: the trail takes you away from, but also to, places you might actually want to get to. Tonight I was heading to a sports-store for skate laces, etc., and I really enjoyed getting away from the loud roadways to seek refuge by the naturalized creek (i.e. where before a concrete barrier blocked the natural flow of water and watery life under the Main Street bridge i.e. fish, etc., the first photo (above) shows the post-barrier flow under the Main Street/Osler Bridge.)
Why does God did this to me? why does God allowed me to face these things? but many times it is not God doing these things, and it is not God allowing them to happen either, he grieves in many things that we faced in life, while we faced them, and in return we thought it is Him, but were not Him doing them. God is an unchanging God in His characters and Natures. No matter what we face in our lifetime, the good news is that, “God is always good, and is always loving”, the things we faced in life and the circumstances we face in life does not define “who God is”.
34. Meeting me in another country.
My husband works everyday at a job that isn’t probably his favorite, in reality. (that’s being kind) It’s third shift, it’s dangerous, and it doesn’t pay a whole heck of a lot in the worlds terms. But it’s a job. A good job. It has insurance… and in this economy, that alone is working for.
Well, it was one of those days. It started when I was lacing up my shoes on the landing outside my apartment. Like most mornings lately, I could hear the phoebe in the woods across from me, very close to the edge of the woods. By the time I made it down the stairs, it was well back in the woods, and I have no idea how it knows that I am coming. That goes along with something else I have noticed, critters know what the beep of a camera obtaining a focus lock is. I can’t count the number of times I have had my camera on something, waiting for the auto-focus to do its thing, and as soon as the camera beeps at me to tell me to shoot, the critter is gone.
I will not get started on the so-called ‘Final Frontier’ of space because the more you know about that, the more you realize that it doesn’t really matter because we can’t travel faster than the speed of light, though it’s a new land, and new place to discover, it is ultimately nothing but the backdrop upon which our world is the stage: It’s there, but you can tell the set designers didn’t put as much effort into it as they did the actual set because in the end the entire thing is an abstract.
Wed 16th
small piece of ginger, chopped
Blogging is a funny thing...we tell our most intimate thoughts for all to read and yet most of the time I find myself sitting and wondering, "who is this person!?" I know them...but yet I don't know them! I want to know who the person is behind all those words so I thought of a great way for all of us to "meet" each other!
But here’s the thing about 4/21/78 at Rupp arena: apparently no one showed up and the security was dicks. That’s the story. Which is the problem with knowing anything, really, about the actual gig part of it–it removes the textuality of the text (well, not just the text, but also the text) and places the praxis of the ur-Dead and the…ah, fuck it. i can’t even make fun of that kind of crap anymore. The best thing one can say of any music is nothing, there’s music on, shit the fuck up. But the second best thing you can say is, “Listen to this. Now, Now, you must.” When he got excited about an upcoming song or passage or transition, my friend Glenn would grab your forearm and he was strong. There was no getting away from the Sugaree he was offering you.
The third problem with the enhancement debate is the tendency for opponents of enhancement to advance sweeping empirical claims without evidence. This is a serious methodological error.
In addition to the word list above, he’s added:
With a creak and a shout, the carter moved away and she urged her own horse forwards. Over her shoulder, she glanced back at Alice, who rode behind one of the guards from Shorecross, her mouth hanging open as she stared at the tall houses either side of them.
684 D-XI/25-27/1974. On the Rosenberg-Sobell Case. With Malcolm P. Sharp and Morton Sobell. Channel 7-TV, Chicago, Illinois.
that when a whole day had almost passed and i haven't messaged him.
(bottom) Illustration from Paddle-to-the-sea by C.Holling, 1941
ps- media definitely fuelling this fire!
I pondered her question all day long. I felt it was important enough to merit thought, prayer, and God’s full involvement, not simply an “off the top of my head” response.
I have been dreaming about fields of lavender.
What about gas chambers?
Frances K. Mertes
Allard recognized this and started planning the car that’s on show in 1960. He used a Chrysler Hemi V8 fitted with a GMC supercharger, clothed in a lightweight, streamlined body.
Maybe he looks better in hindsight? No, Romney’s former constituents still don’t like him and still don’t want him to be president.
Bodyguards in Bed by anthology
Rest in Peace big brother, you'll be missed.
5. I wish that I had let myself be happier.
What would YOU do in this situation?
Spence Campbell (REP) 0.79% 34
I planned a couple of fun dates including watching the BSU game at Buffalo Wild Wings, going to see Immortals and an intimate dinner at....
Andrew Monastra had the only sensible comments that were reported. And trust me Andrew, you are right on when you say Dave has valid points which are not personally driven. Dave Walsh could be a great asset to PDIDA. He is already a great asset to Pottstown.
As the afternoon wore on with the usual village tittle tattle, the stories and laughter, someone mentioned the latest edition of the Village Gazette. Had we seen the article by the Village Players for new members to take part in their next production the following March? This was an annual appeal which had always stirred something in me. Could I, should I ? However, in the past I had never quite got round to doing anything. Too many excuses. That afternoon though, fuelled by wine and summer sun, I announced that I would indeed be auditioning for a part. A few other sozzled souls expressed similar intentions – none of which were ever fulfilled. My wife gave me that knowing look as much to say “are you sure?”. The more I thought about it, the more it appealed to me. What better way to finally emerge from my darkness. I would be committed to something I would have to complete. Imagine the confidence I would gain from the achievement. An opportunity to prove to myself that I was still a capable person.
Cars meandering passed missions and a wash-and-fold.
Relocating Optimum services, cable television and phone services, cable TV and phone services to Brooklyn, NY is often easy to do. Rule number one is to verify that the services are available at the new address.
So you can imagine our joy when we found Fence Me In, a great local company that quoted us an extremely fair price for a new cedar fence (and retaining wall!)! One hour after they arrived, I came home to this view:
Flowers from my stash have been sponged in SU Marina Mist & Buckaroo Blue
I am mostly loving mixing silver, gold, metal, bangles, leather and cord for a grungy eclectic look on my wrists.
They gave him a piece of baked fish; he took it and ate it in front of them.
Similarly, the book starts off at the end of a conversation between the author and an unnamed friend. I think it would have been better if the entire conversation, or at least the stunning realization that had inspired the conversation, had been shared with readers. Instead, it was vague and I didn’t grasp the full point of that conversation. I’ve had the “Well, duh” moments that the author describes, but I’m not sure what kind of “Well, duh” moments he specifically meant. I can’t identify with that story because there aren’t enough details in the author’s description to stimulate a recall of those memories. As that’s the biggest and only flaw I’ve found with the book, it’s not something that makes it any less enjoyable or any less intelligent.
They also said we were missing two parts to the application, one of which was the descriptive notice. Now since that fell under my jurisdiction I know, without a doubt, that it is done.
A local broker, however, had a more pragmatic view, saying that although Sime Darby was keen to venture into high-end development, it did not necessarily want to obtain everything at one go via a general offer, which would have been a much riskier proposition.
What do you mean the word "fairest" means beautiful?
I love saying this, it is so often true. Now, it turns out that working fewer hours is effective, as well. Too bad I didn’t read this article before I took an 80-hour a week job after b-school. This article does highlight two of the reasons that my employer and I did not work out.
Rise up shepherd, rise up
“Beloved, I pray that in all respects you may prosper and be in good health, just as your soul prospers.” – 3 John 2
The keyboard is flush with the desktop and will be some kind of touch screen thing (like the small panels on the entrance hatch.) I'll need to find some cool tech interface thing to fill the screen.
Though still thirty feet away, my heart sank as I pushed the mower toward the birdbath. At ten feet away I already had tears in my eyes. There in the grass, just a couple of feet from the birdbath, the waiting/trusting female northern cardinal lay dead in the grass. I don’t know how she died, only that she did.
For the first Evening Academy Erik Wenzel will present ideas relating to the subject of a book he recently co-edited and contributed to: Internal Necessity: a reader tracing the inner logics of the contemporary art field (Sternberg Press 2010). Theses ideas, along with concepts of memes, knowledge production/transmssion & how things that don’t make any sense are more interesting to think about than things that do, not only apply to the exhibition but provide a frame for the subsequent Evening Academies.
You are my trainer.
So I WAS going to blog about all that but decided not to.
But we missed our kiddies. It may not have been the first day, or even the second, but by day 3, I think everyone started getting a little homesick. (Maybe that's why everyone in our first two classes was a little teary?)
Finally .A Photo Of Me in my School's Rugby League team in Halifax.Can You Spot me?I used to love playing Rugby League..I am a mild mannered person but the moment I put on my shirt I turned into a raw-meat-eating animal!
Speaking of war, the politics of sight sculpt our martial policies. We ended conscription, separating most of our fellow citizens from the consequences of military action; we conduct combat via unmanned aerial vehicles that remove the pilot-shooters from the populations being bombed; and both the military establishment and the media themselves suppress photographs of coffins or battlefield viscera that might show us what war really looks like.
If you'll be having whiskey -- and you should, you should -- Irish whiskey is the most friendly stuff you'll find, soft and sweet and very much approachable. You can hardly go wrong here, so it's almost foolish to steer you. The Holy Trinity -- Jameson, Bushmills, Tullamore -- is readily available, and with the general improvement in the quality of Irish over the past 20 years, you can't really go wrong.
But the kids had fun.
The scribe at The Brew Site also got one of these mystical, mixed six-packs of Cinder Cone and Red Chair – and on Christmas Eve no less? Christ, I’m not living right.
“They have been suspicious of me from the start. I’ve tried to add some culture to this place and what is the thanks I get, protest over fostering Greek and interfering with their religious services, ” King Herod said as he tapped a pen on his desk.
The owner, Tim d'Offay, has traveled the world for 15 years, imported tea for 11 years and had Postcard Teas open for five. Postcard Teas, get it? "In one sense, these teas are the postcards I send from around the world," he said. The labels of each tea he sells are designed to look like postcards — the 50-gram postcard bags allegedly can be written on like postcards and sent legally through the mails — with each cancel stamp listing the tea's origin.
Add the school concerns with the medical needs, special foods due to allergies (I think I will have to take the ENTIRE family off of wheat due to Caedmon's severe wheat allergies...the last few times I have ground wheat he seemed to have a slight reaction), Jeff's and the children's musical activities outside the home (me? Yes, I dropped my outside musical activities years ago and now am satisfied with daily singing with the little guys and occasionally sitting down to play for a time at the piano), extra church meetings, remodeling projects and my normal food prep, cooking, cleaning and now the Christmas shopping to do as well...I find myself having to drop projects that I have planned in order to meet the needs of the family. Isn't that what Moms do?
Who are these people? Why do Pinterest users respond so strongly to products that are pinned? This infographic from Tamba breaks down the stats, explaining why Pinterest is so powerful with its consumption-friendly audience.
STREED GC, EVERHART KD. Use of adult immunization strategies to increase the take of the influenza vaccine. A 2 year review. AAOHN J 2000; 48: 521-525.
Art House is ”an independent Brooklyn based company that organizes global, collaborative art projects” as mentioned on the Sketchbook Project website, and they’re the master minds who are responsible for this beautiful sketchbook prodigy. Here’s the link if you’d like to read up on it, http://www.arthousecoop.com/projects/sketchbookproject .
I am sold. There are several little jars of this scrumptious treat cooling on my counter as I type. Another batch is just about ready for a night in the slow cooker. I haven't given up on Spiced Zucchini Bars with Cream Cheese Frosting for taming my monster zucchini, but I have found another delicious alternative.
I was just thinking about this, and for lack of a better word, I’ll call it a blurb. So thanks for reading my little blurb. (:
If it doesn’t come naturally to you, join the club and these are three absolutely easy tips that anyone can use. So with these tips, you’ll become a flirt master.
Right about now, as we head into May, local farmers start to bring their asparagus crops to our markets. The minute I see the signs “Locally Grown” sitting atop mounds of the native spears, I fill my cart with bunches. There are so many ways to use this spring produce. I serve them as an appetizer with a bowl of aioli for dipping, or I grill or blanche them, then season them with a sprinkle of lemon zest and a hint of fleur de sel. Sometimes
Then a few days ago we had lunch with other friends, one of whom is an amateur astronomer, equally full of foreboding about those sunspots, as worried about their continuing effect as people were about Y2K 11 years or so ago, and I hope as needlessly. We told him about our visit to M.'s observatory. In turn he directed us to the supernova M101, saying it was growing fainter by the hour, but we might just catch it if we got the binoculars out that night.
The concept of murder is treated almost like a virus here, as it infects Jeff through the television screen and changes him from a brow-beaten husband to an embittered man with homicidal tendencies bubbling just beneath the surface. This, for me, was the most interesting aspect of the story although it was unfortunately only briefly touched upon.
boil again. Make it seethe with the blood
Like many socialists Marable was happy to work with communists. In November 1989 he addressed the 10th anniversary conference of the Communist Party controlled U.S. Peace Council, alongside two well known D.S.A. affiliates, Michigan Congressman John Conyers and his Vermont colleague Bernie Sanders.
My friend asked me the other day: If you messed up on several tests, and were pretty sure that you had a close to zero percent chance of rescuing you grade in that class, what would you do?
I guess by now Katie can may rosette's in her sleep,
Our days aboard the Portland Rose brought many magical moments that I will treasure forever, but coming back down to earth, clocking into the time stream of normal life, I was caught by surprise. I’ve been struggling with waves of shocking news received when we touched down, overwhelming loss of life and, less importantly, the loss of the job that I waited for so patiently.
Is she really, though? Sure, Lisa’s a weirdo (sorry to be blunt) and Lauren/Samantha (who are pretty interchangeable) are definitely portrayed a stereotypical chavs, but all Jasmine really seems to do is look down on them for not being quite as perfect as she is.
If that's what they're up to, it's a disgrace based on how they're the kind of movement that's been pushing the mindset that Hasidics don't have responsibilities of their own for the country, which is not so at all. See this post at Via the Rabbi, which makes a pretty good argument about why they should, and how plenty of Biblical rabbis had jobs of all sorts, which helps make the case about why it's important even for today's Hasidics to do their part in nation-building.
1) The BEST way to get noticed is to have a unique name. I’m lucky in that way – though some of you probably still can’t figure out how to pronounce it – there is a post on it here, it’s still a great name in my opinion. Purely because, my parents half made my name up due to astrological,numerological,traditional,cultural beliefs. If you’d like me to expand, please let me know, that will be another post. Having a unique name means that so long as you have great content, you will be noticed on Search, and people tend to remember it. Also this goes without saying really, but hey, this is supposed to be informative – if you have a great name, drop it in a couple of times – new readers don’t know who you are do they?!
in a night sky
I have loved Nina shoes ever since I started wearing heels so I was really ecstatic when I was contacted by the company to host a giveaway on CB! Their styles always mesh with my musts for the perfect shoe: Classic and demure but with full-on style and panache! ;o)
is because these animals are raised for their wool.
Roger Nichols & The Small Circle Of Friends- The Drifter
He was one of my totally uncool Mom’s favorite singers, which by definition, meant he had to be someone I’d detest.
The next morning, we departed as promised thankfully. It turns out our group was a lovely bunch from all over! And the sights on offer were incredible. A short stop at the train cemetery was nice. Then we went to the Salt Museum at Colchani where the process of salt filtration was explained, before we moved on to the actual Salar (Salt flats). They were the most beautiful thing I had seen! When there is rain water on the salar, it turns into the biggest mirror on earth, where it is said the sky meets the earth. Believe me, this was no exaggeration! We had lunch following an incredible photo session. On our way to the hostel, we even managed to get two punctures in the same day to add to the adventure!
I love Christmas ornaments. I love vintage and sampler style ornaments. One designer that has the look that I appreciate is Sandra at Homespun Elegance. Her style is very elegant and timeless, not something that may fall out of style or look hokey in a few years.
How could we love each other if we do not forgive? Holding on un-forgiveness brings a burden in our heart. So, when we have an argument with somebody else and we do not forgive him/her, we cannot be ourselves. There is this one thing, that hold us back and we are not natural. When we love somebody we feel joy to be with them, we develop the relationship, we seek for intimacy. It is obvious that un-forgiveness comes in conflict with love, does not promote, develop love.
Welcome to the Sunday segment where I spout utter crap from my fingers in a vain attempt to try to bring levity, brevity and humour to this blog as well as trying to fulfill the ‘idiocy’ section of the blog’s tagline.
The Stork Fund is on Pinterest! Have you heard about this latest social media craze? It’s a virtual pin board that allows you to organize all the wonderful things in your life. In a word, it’s amazing!
Another nice benefit of creating the tests ahead of time has been that I can see a history of which questions I’ve given to each student. I can also quickly and easily find a problem from someone else’s test and copy it into their new file when I’m making up the tests each Saturday. I am keeping all of the files named with the student’s name and the date of the extra test in one folder like so:
The menu included homemade waffles ( I am married to the world's best waffle maker) with some homemade maple syrup of course, thick cut maple bacon, sausages and fruit salad. It was a great way to start the weekend.
Limiting blogrolls to a few elite blogs, also reduces the diversity. Apparently, affirmative action is good for universities, but doesn't apply to blogs. Although I am opposed to quotas and am completely colorblind, I would not be surprised if my blogroll is in fact more diverse than those of many major liberal blogs. Some bloggers of color have even learned at their peril not to rock the boat too much or risk getting delinked.
Mesdan pushes himself up onto his elbows. He’s sticky with blood now, his back feels covered with it. Knowing that most of it is Eliss’s is not helping. He manages to sit up on the third try. He still feels weak and shaky, as the conduit to those energies. His body is afire.
Include:
“What happened?” I asked.
That's some kind of game you have there. Honestly, if you didn't find me physically attractive, you should've just sucked it up, bought me a beer and said that you didn't feel we were a match. It happens, and its a lot easier to swallow than what you pulled, which really hurt my feelings.
But,I only login to my facebook account about once a month so I don't get overwhelmed by the overload of information.
Many of the Jews who had come to visit Mary and witnessed this event become believers, but some of them go and tell the Pharisees what they had seen. The Pharisees are alarmed at word of this miracle, and call a meeting. Some of the more frustrated Pharisees ask why they’re even bothering; Jesus has done lots of miracles, of which raising Lazarus is only the most recent, and it’s only a matter of time before everyone in all of Israel believes in him. When that happens, they’re all doomed, because Rome will finally and inexorably take note of what’s going on and crush them all. Jerusalem and the temple will be destroyed, and all of Israel and the Jewish nation will be destroyed too, they declare with a mixture of anger and bitterness.
to fight and win
I called Target (for example) to cancel my card when they initiated an across-the-board interest increase to 23.24% on purchases (with Target Visa), or 25.24% (with the Target card). The representative I spoke with said that "the recession has been hard on Target." I am not an economist, but imagine the brand loyalty that would result if Target had sent out a letter telling card holders it was lowering rates, in their interest? Instead, this somewhat more savvy retailer comes off as yet another greed machine. I found the rate hike so disturbing that I made a decision to not shop there (or at any other big box retailer) until things change. Sorry, Target – was always kind of fond of you in the past! Here's more about changes to the law.
Tactics against Scorpions: A tank by its lonesome isn’t a hard quarry. Jump into a Mongoose and drive behind it, hijack and pop in a grenade. You can melee while hijacking to rid yourself of the occupants and keep the tank, but keep in mind it’ll be close to exploding. Don’t think you can avoid its gun by flying up to avoid it, and never try to outpace an entrenched tank camping somewhere- get the weapons necessary such as a Spartan Laser or focus on other enemies.
I am still nervous from time to time, but now that we have made it past the 2 major milestones I am better. We got past 19 w 6 days when we lost Cadynce, and now we have kit 24 weeks so each day is better.
Mathafeni’s lifeless body was found on the morning of 1 May 2008 in Sebokeng Zone 20. He was a community activist involved with the Sebokeng Ward 2 Concerned Residents that on Tuesday blockaded the Golden Highway to demand that the government responds to their memorandum, which was submitted on the 10th of March. Police arrested Mathafeni on Tuesday, the 29th of April, and beat him so badly with batons that he had to see a doctor on his release on Wednesday morning. He was re-arrested later in the evening – and last seen alive in the hands of the arresting officers.
Then he gave us some TNT and we went crazy. However, we kept dying and he had to keep giving us more stuff so I told him to op us. He did and then all hell broke loose. We basically decimated the entire biome. Then Riley started a new project. He was placing TNT all over an entire mountain. Being the good kid that I am, I went to assist him. Tyler joined in and…well you can see for yourself.
You are so confident that every woman you have met could not give you what you wanted. But what was it that you wanted in the first place? Once you are sure of what you want, you will know exactly what to look for in your woman. What are the qualities that you feel are necessary in a person? What are the attributes you are willing to make a compromise on? Have you thought about all these?
But here I was in Hawaii, with the opportunity to actually go skydiving, and I was scared out of my mind.
to my email address.
Among other key measures announced were plans to allow 100 per cent foreign ownership of 17 service subsectors including in the legal industry, engineering sector, healthcare and logistics.
Then, Samuel Adams turns around and delivers on the Belgian Session ale, at 4.3% (some details here), and it was wonderful. Skillful brewing got a lot of flavor out of the yeast, spices, and fruit peels in the beer, and that's what session beer brewing is all about. This one is a cross between a Belgian pale and a witbier, and it works quite well: the spicy notes mingled with light and creamy orange, and the whole thing finishes crisp and dry. This isn't me liking session beer, this is me liking a good beer.
Phone cam recursion
But wait. It’s not another child saying those things to your kid.
AdriN2001: Yeah?
Aaron declared the month of June "Aaron's Month" since it was his first Father's Day (which fell on our 2nd wedding anniversary this year), and his birthday (which was yesterday). We had a lot to celebrate this month.
And I’m a member of Amazon Prime. For $79 a year I get unlimited 2-day shipping, access to 12 ebooks (1 a month from their library of 100,000 titles) and unlimited access to thousands of movies and TV shows. This is another tremendous bargain. I also buy ebooks for my Kindle and iPad from Amazon. Costs run from free to $9.99. On very rare occasions I’ll pay more, but it hurts. Digital books just seem less valuable than physical books. I don’t feel like I collect digital books like I do with hardcovers. I don’t even feel I own ebooks.
WLB: Koa Misi; Gary Guyton; Josh Kaddu*
As humans, it’s hard knowing God’s will all of the time. Harder still, is having the passion to consistently cooperate with it. It’s difficult to imagine we could ever struggle with our desire for God’s will to be done on earth as it is in heaven. Yet, many of us agonize over it—just as Jesus did on the night He was betrayed. The biggest challenge we face–is being willing to let go of our own will and trust God enough to say, “Your will be done—whatever it is”…in the little and large issues of this life.
Right now, as I type this, we are cruising iTunes buying James Taylor, Simon & Garfunkel, Judy Collins, Joni Mitchell...no need for the Beatles because we already own everything and have it set up that the second anything is released it is automatically purchased.
This article has been revised to reflect the following correction:
I don’t know what answer Congressman Paul was listening to. He obviously wasn’t listening to my answer. (APPLAUSE)
The beer got me reaching for my fridge before I went out, so I went for the only thing I ever eat with my beers:
When darkness falls, so we wake
So why does he get so much notice around my blog?
- L'Oreal Wear Infinite eyeshadow: 15% off
Upcoming Pathways Planning Information Evenings allow parents and students to explore opportunities that high schools have to offer in Halton.
After our class, we were led us on a caravan to the upstart little shop, where we sampled flavours inspired by her childhood in Guadalajara, Mexico. It was like being shown through a secret passageway into a world of flavour which my young heart had not yet dared to imagine. I tried hibiscus for the first time in my life that day. It was like nothing I'd ever tasted before... sweet and piquant and addictive. I've never forgotten it.
B: … Justice League.
Christmas again involves get togethers with family and specific gift-exchanging traditions. But one thing that I always remind my children of is the tradition of seeing the decorations in Washington D.C.'s President's Park. Since my husband's family lives there, and we spend practically every Christmas there, it's something that we've seen every year.
He (accused) told the police that he was not a thief neither did he attempted to harm the couple, but was only watching them to derive sexual satisfaction and pleaded for leniency.
The fame of that glorious ruler of the world, the philosopher-king, the foremost of the Kuru family, spreads through the opulent capitol city.
Dawie Roodt, chief economist at Efficient Group, says although the markets sent a strong message of how they feel about Manuel, he does not expect him to last long in an ANC government considered to be too left-leaning for comfort.
2 tsp oil
Here are the simple rules: (I hate rules!)
"Oh my gosh. I am so sorry. What are you doing here anyway?"
Economic Liberalism/Economic Freedom/Capitalism (which always works) or Keynesianism/Krugman/Marx (which has never worked)?
He's good too.
Looking back, I know now that it was that class that led me to get a bachelor's and then a master's degree in Political Science. I hadn't been so fascinated in anything in years.
Received: March 2012.
Also, if you end up liking the method of embedding, here's how you can do it for your Blogger blog:
Often, it seems as though the stores do not want help getting things done correctly. This particular business is bad about just throwing things wherever they will fit (and sometimes even if they don't fit!) and not worrying about things being in their correct location according to the shelf tags. In the instance of the shelf that wouldn't reattach, a worker went to get us a new one and never returned so the products that should have been on that shelf could not be put on display. We had to leave them in a buggy for a worker to set later. Very frustrating!
Help us raise funds for the Friends of the San Gabriels. 50% of proceeds from the sale of merchandise will be donated to FSG.
First a gorgeous jumper. I’ve bought a few for her over the winter and they are lovely quality and wash well.
here’s the thing, though: i don’t even know these people’s names, at the end of the BBQ. somehow introductions and names weren’t much of a priority :)
This postcard was included in the package. Kimberly took a tag she created and added a doily, buttons and a ribbon bow to have the postcard reflect her style.
SMS: What did you make that you're most proud of?
*Fist Pumps like a Guido at Spring Break*
Nature is the physical world including plants, animals and landscapes as they tend to preserve nature as they found it. Landscapes draw one towards themselves and they look so beautiful that one can never get enough of them. As the navigator, the engineer, and the artist, nature is our school. Nature’s pallet has inspiring colours as a tonic. More often than not to make a living on mother earth, one thing we all usually miss is the beauty of nature. No one ever stops to look around and observe the magic and miracle of nature in every cubic inch of mother earth. How does Nature affect you ? Nature is a language and every new fact one learns is a new word. Thomas Bailey Aldrich said about the touch of nature, “When first the crocus thrusts its point of gold up through the still snow-drifted garden mould; and flooded green things in dim woods unclose their crinkled spears, a sudden tremor goes into my veins.” Since prehistoric times, people have felt an affinity with wildlife. We admire birds and animals as symbols of strength, speed, cunning, even nobility. Wildlife gifts speak to people’s love of animals and, when well chosen, can enhance the experience nature provides. In the study of animals structure and formation teach any one lesson, it is the unity of the plan of construction, the correlation of parts and forces for the preservation of life, and the simplicity of the scheme by which nature attains that end, states the 1869 British Medical Journal. In Out-Of-Door-Life For The Children they states, ” We were all meant to be naturalists, each in his own degree, and it is inexcusable to live in a world so full of the marvels of plant and animal life to care for none of these things.” As Henry Fielding (1707 – 1754) aptly put it, “All nature wears one universal grin.”
So I’m doing some last minute preparations before I leave. I packed my bag last night, but now I need to take out the trash so it doesn’t sit and fester in my apartment for four days. I’m also going to take a quick shower before I leave, since I don’t know when I’ll be taking one next.
Notable performances: Juan d'Arienzo c Alberto Echague, Rodolfo Biagi c Jorge Ortiz
I'm back! My long weekend was spent happily in Milwaukee and Kenosha Wisconsin visiting Nick and the family. So much excitement was packed in to this weekend and now I'm pretty much exhausted! Here's a little recap :)
As a result, hundreds of defendants nationwide remain in prison or on parole for crimes that might merit exoneration, a retrial or a retesting of evidence using DNA because FBI hair and fiber experts may have misidentified them as suspects.
I think, busy though I am, that I can commit to doing at least one small piece of art each week. I started two weeks ago so that I could hang the first thought on New Year's Day.
And that’s why I love this song. There really is “something about the ocean” when it comes to me and God. There is something about standing on that shore, on an immeasurable number of grains of sand, facing a vast, truly untamed sea. It makes me realize that God is so much more than I think He is. He is so many more facets. Just like the ocean is way more than what my eye can see, my God is so much more than He appears to be on the surface. He’s deeper than man can measure. He’s ever-flowing, yet somehow never changing. How can I not love a God who drew Himself along the shore?
Today’s Moosday comes to us from Ore City Texas, home of Outlaw Cattle Company. Owner Micah Morgan started his herd of purebred Santa Gertrudis cattle nine years ago and has been successful on the show circuit.
*The answer choices are listed in the order in which they were shown on my blog site.
Soon after he met Thororm and claimed the fee of him. He said he was not going to pay it.
But...I have never taught a class on making the flag....until now.
The paper industry is the 4th largest contributor to greenhouse gas emissions among United States manufacturing industries, and contributes 9% of the manufacturing sector's carbon emissions.
Ok, I know I’m spoiled! Here is how my day has gone — and my husband said it was going to be a busy day when we woke up this morning!
So I'm taking a break from blog posts this week, mostly because I won't be able to respond to your comments easily, and, more importantly, reciprocate by checking your blogs.
We were too excited by the glory to recognize the tone of the previous article, and when the BBC asked my father to participate in a discussion about the impact of cinema on impressionable minds while we performed Zulu dances in the background, we were devastated when he said no. Apart from the insanity of actually wanting to be filmed frolicking in nothing but gym knickers and cotton wool, we simply didn’t get what it was all about. I thought it was our age that made us exceptional, but my mother pointed out wearily that boys much younger than us played at violent westerns all the time. What made this a story was the fact that we were girls.
Saturated Fat: 0.0 g 0.1%
Actually, I can only vouch for the fact that they drowned my classmates, and very nearly Mr Hangley, who stood staring at me like I’d grown horns and started tap-dancing naked on the desk. Which, thinking back, may have been the smarter thing to do.
Therapist: Courts are smarter than that. Horrible.
I feel so strongly that my experience happened so that I could learn from it. What I’ve learned is profound and it’s put me on my path/calling to share my story in hopes it will help others to come forward. Suicide is NOT a dirty word, and I am doing my best to make it be so. I know my purpose is to help others heal from this devastation, to accept and forgive, both themselves and those who took their lives, to help them to heal and go on to help others and pay it forward.
Spend time with young people so that you know what they are doing.
Sir Geoffrey Bindman
Tunisia, Egypt, Libya, Yemen, Syria, and others might not have been exploding in revolt for the past three to four decades, but that is not to say there hasn’t been a constant string of imprisoned, beaten, tortured, killed, or disappeared that laid the kindle for the fire to come.
“They believe in violence and racism. I cannot talk to such people. Let the people make their deductions about their characteristics,” said Lim, adding that action should be taken for littering.
The right to live your life or being merely safe at a subsistence level?
I went to Sunday school in the sleigh.
I'm so addicted to the mystery aspect in any novels. Especially when it comes to murder mysterious. I'm always the person wanting to guess who could be the killer! Venom is exactly what I'm talking about. Cass finds a woman murdered!? She tries to find out who killed her and ends up getting sucked into secret societies and such? Yesss! This is definitely my kind of thing. I'm so down for figuring out who the killer is! I'm kind of hoping the killer is reason #3! LOL!!
I spent way too many years in my life being a crazy person. Trust issues, intimacy issues, anger issues… issues, issues, issues.
After a while you realise that he's no longer just your husband's adopted son. The pleasure you get that night in Clapham, when the whole bar is clapping and singing along to Happy Song is something akin to loving pride.
The past week has been quite exhausting for our whole family. Justin had knee surgery last Tuesday. He has been having knee pain for many years now and after physical therapy, cortisone shots, and medicine all failed, the last resort was surgery. We are hoping this helps and that he will be able to run again soon!
RE: Do you believe that South Africa belongs to whites? That the Cape belongs to whites?
If you have slight and I mean slight discoloration, concealer will usually be enough on its own to hide anything you’re trying to conceal. But what about the girls like me who have blue, green, or purple under-eye circles? Or what about the girls who suffer from red under-eye circles? We need to correct these nuisance colors before we can conceal and brighten up our eyes! Here are some pictures to demonstrate what cream colored products you will need if your under eye circles fall under these categories:
The influence on the men's adventure books is pretty obvious. I'm convinced Joe Rosenberger was a big fan of these things, because "Death Merchant" was a term used in the Spider books, as was "Murder Master," and Rosenberger wrote series under both of those titles. He also used a lot of exclamation points and concentrated on action scenes, just like The Spider books did. Also, the Spider had a habit of marking his victims with a red spider seal, and that was echoed in a lot of the 70's books, like the marksman's medals Mack Bolan left around, or The Penetrator's arrowheads.
“It’s personal enslavement is what it is…” Michelle started blah-blahing her campaign speak.
It could be the first ever episode without a DNA test................... erm, hopefully. Girlfriend try explaining THAT one to anyone other than Maury Povich!!!
The Brits are reporting that Justin Timberlake has been getting awfully close to Rihanna as of late. While in New York, the two have been seen sneaking around and trying to conceal their secret love affair from the public (and Timberpuss’ girlfriend, Jessica Biel).
Each day your whole life through
It's a red letter day.
"As the market for e-books grows, it will be important for readers to have access in e-book format to the best contemporary literature the world has to offer," said Andrew Wylie, President of Odyssey Editions. "This publishing program is designed to address that need, and to help e-book readers build a digital library of classic contemporary literature."
We shall never forget the day
Isn’t that great, education union employees have their own union? Is there a union for employees of education union employee unions?
The other thing wildlife does to frustrate me is to gang up on me. Today, back on the edge of the new swamp, I shot one photo that has six species of wildlife in the frame at one time. Of course you need a magnifying glass to pick them out, so I’m not going to post it, but there were a pair of mallards swimming in the swamp, a blue jay getting a drink, a robin looking for a meal, a fox squirrel doing the same, a red winged blackbird singing from a bush on the back edge of the swamp, and what I think was a song sparrow also looking for food. Of course the mallards posed for me, I’m not going to bother with that one. I did get a photo of the blue jay.
plays light with cross references of focus and wrapping up of flair, it is too much to ask for the temple of this life to stoop even when appearances determine otherwise, it is another discourse altogether that opts for this sort of distortion, but we all know this pattern is smoothly run over us in different directions regardless of this focus,
Aqua seam binding, lace, & hat pins: The Ribbon Girl
Grind the urad dal first, until smooth.Keep aside.
Everything I had seen beyond the window – the railway crossing bathed in evening light, the chirping voices of the children, and the dazzling color of the oranges raining down on them – had passed in the twinkling of an eye. Yet the scene had been vividly and poignantly burned in my mind, and from this, welling up within me, came a strangely bright and buoyant feeling.
"YOUR CHOICE OF FOUR SKETCHES THIS TIME"
My heart is held by love so unconditional
The fight that ensues is almost as funny, with a lot of it centering on having Sara dangling from an open window ledge…somehow, I guess. Sara tells Rebecca they aren’t friends, stabbing her in the back metaphorically, followed by stabbing her in the back physically with a knife! Oh The Roommate…always playing with my expectations. Then the movie ends with happy music and Sara deciding that she “doesn’t want to have a roommate for a while”…get it? She's underplaying the seriousness of the situation by giving a lighthearted ending quip! That's a considerate way to end the film, as now we won't be depressed due to the deaths of several people as well as an innocent kitten.
I often wonder how one becomes a participant in one of these studies. Is there an ad placed in the University paper that reads:
One would think that an officer with two years on would not have to be told not to drive his cruiser down a grassy hill into a soft muddy field when it's been raining for two days.
and the MQG challenge and a January FRMQG meeting and I got to thinking, perhaps these are just the push, my proverbial "Tail Wind".
From a rooftop in London to an explosive finale, Joseph O’Loughlan has his normal life disrupted and then destroyed.
Each hymn a lover’s quest.
Dear Lord, thank You for Your work of righteousness that’s increasing greatly upon the earth in our day. I declare that the gospel of Jesus Christ will continually prevail and gain the ascendancy in the hearts of men all over the world, as more labourers rise up to the challenge of the harvest, in Jesus Christ Name Amen!
The first was Atlantic Recording Corp. v. Brennan, 534 F. Supp.2d 278 (D. Conn. February 13, 2008), a short opinion by Judge Janet Bond Arterton on plaintiff’s motion for a default judgment, an unusual procedural posture. Judge Atherton declined to grant the motion because she thought defendant might have a valid defense that there needs to be an actual distribution of a copy to violate the distribution right,” and that as pled plaintiff’s claim might not be able to satisfy that requirement.
I used to act as Macintosh troubleshooter/repairman/tutor for Tom about ten years ago, when he lived in a tiny closet-sized apartment near the U.N. building in midtown Manhattan. When I say this place was closet-sized, I mean it literally -- I know for a fact some people who read this blog have closets larger than that whole apartment. Tom shared the apartment with a three-legged cat; there wasn't enough room in that place for a fourth leg. Tom was one of the nicest people I ever worked for, and absolutely one of the sweetest and most generous people I encountered in the comics field.
I find it positive because it shows that Arabs also can have success in a world, where they normally would be considered unwelcome. This victory was based on Kader’s skills, and the viewers choice to focus on the voice, more than the identity, proving that the mutual dislike can be set aside. Kader herself also expressed surprise and pride, stating that this showed that though there is disagreements and trouble between Jews and Arabs, then people can see other sides of each other, and not always making the hard relation be the overall defining subject.
1 explaining
McNerney re-affirmed that Boeing remains on schedule to complete firm configuration of the 737 Max series in 2013.
My body temple is built like this: Nutrition is the foundation, and the pillars are Loving Movement (exercise), Restoration (sleep), Hydration, Nurturing (self-care), Service (caring for others), Spirit, Cleansing (internal and environmental), and Relationships.
What do you hope readers take away from Karma and Reincarnation?
My dear friends and prayer warriors,
Of course chutney’s of tamarind, or coconut could be great accompaniment, but for my daughters and me, it best when eaten with a good book in hand and a cup of coffee.
If you want to have energy in December to enjoy the things that matter most,
Eric’s cause is getting a lot of attention and support. An online petition on Change.org that was started on March 24 now has more than 80,000 signatures. Yooper Shirts, a T-shirt store in Ishpeming, is selling shirts that say “let em play.” Resident Nick Joseph came in to buy two shirts on Monday afternoon saying “it’s just one of those positive things we don’t see in our society anymore.”
The science of the new millennium could derive its premises from these universal multidimensional laws, changing our point of view, observing things from the all-dimensional spiritual level of the Absolute rather than from the limited three-dimensional level of a terrestrial being. Having crossed the threshold of the new millennium, each of us has a choice: whether to remain secure and fixed in our limited notions or to start the process of forming a multidimensional view grounded in spirit. So, do we want to remain caterpillars or fly free as butterflies?
To others and in that giving, you have emptied
This week, we're looking forward to the beginning of The NEXT CROP CHEF competition at Cookin' Up Creations. It's a non-elimination contest with six challenges over three weeks. The person with the most points at the end of the contest will be named CROP CHEF and will win a prize package, plus the opportunity to be "Chef of the Month" and join the challenge team in presenting challenges, layout of the week and question of the day in March. Come on over and sign up!
a) it was a time when everyone was banned from talking about stuff to each other! How can you tell a story when people are banned from “careless talk”. Plus the whole Auxiliary Unit thing was supposed to be top secret?
1054 D-VI/16/89. “Sexually-Oriented Businesses and the First Amendment: On the Dissenting Opinion in the Court of Appeals, 837 F.2d. 1298, at 1306-1312 (1988).” Memorandum No. 4 for the City Attorney of Dallas, Texas, from Rome, Italy.
I have really missed blogging. face book is different but this BLOG IS SUCH A SACRED PLACE, A PLACE I FEEL FREE TO SHARE ALL MY FEELINGS AND NOT GET JUDGED.
restrictions of hard work and lack of money to the worst horrors of pain and humiliation, defeat, despair, and death. When He was a man, He played the man. He was born in poverty and
1/2 Cup Canola Oil. (I'm sure you could use less, this is my preference)
Thanks for stopping by and please leave a comment, I love reading them.
Use ideas from the Speaking Up section in this chapter to define what cyber-bullying might look like, how to speak up, what a negative reaction might be, and what an effective response could be. Let children make up their own story to use for the practice. Switch roles with them.
I pretty much chuck it all into a mixing bowl and combine then let sit for an hour or so. This is when I add whatever yummies I want to the mix.
Kristy is having a special in her shop this weekend, which will end at midnight, February 28th. Normally this sale is reserved only for those who are on her mailing list, but Kristy has graciously opened this for readers of my blog for this special only. If you would like to be eligible for other sales and specials, please click here to leave a message for Kristy through the contact/conversation section in order to be added to the Coco's Greenhouse mailing list or to follow her on twitter.
So go forth and read Shingeki no Kyojin!
She takes his hand, her touch is light, but cold. She pulls him, by his finger, towards another room, gently urging him behind her, then ahead of her, through the door, sliding in behind him and closing it, with a click.
And unlike other Dardennes films where the harrowing acts are left off-screen, the Dardenne Brothers show this violent behavior in full force. It’s never graphic, but it’s shocking and in full force. One could argue that by leaving similar acts off-screen in their other films made them worse in one’s mind, but here, they force you to take it in with your own eyes, a particularly troubling prospect given it involves a young child.
8 - If you want the rainbow, you've got to put up with the rain.
I can’t speak for every single part of the organization, but I can say that we don’t have big $$ to begin setting aside for our little trust-fund-babies-to-be. The beauty is that the Met Life gang met with us several times, spent hours with us, listening, suggesting, listening a lot more. There was no money exchanged. Yes, there are things they will talk about that involve money…. life insurance being one of them. But with each thing they suggested, they always knew that we would only make the choice we could afford, and our choice was not always their “best” option, in their opinion. They were still supportive even then.
HackerBoy suggested on the way home that he maybe he ought to teach me “Lego Indiana Jones” because it is easier. Double-ouch. My son thinks that as far as video games go I’m on par with a retarded puppy.
by Derrick Jensen
- Theresa Le Flem
Quants command enormous respect for their intellectual prowess and mathematical knowledge. With flattering epithets like “rocket scientists” or simply “the brain,” quants silently go about their jobs of validating pricing models, writing C++ programs and developing complicated spreadsheet solutions.
Different rules apply to inter-species fraternisation, of course. No woman has ever dared to touch my posterior without my prior consent. Maybe some were tempted, but there’s something about a gorilla’s hairy rump that intimidates the bravest of humans. Had the big cat trainer ever tried it on with me, I would have applied my weight to a fleshy part of her body until she agreed to write me an apology note. I’ve learned enough about humans to know that talk is cheap – you can’t hold them to anything unless you’ve got it in writing.
The Mountaineer Inn is not one of those monuments. But it is a marvel in its own right, mainly due to its wonderful use of old-school neon. The shotgun-toting neon hillbilly seen above stands about 30 feet tall, and keeps watch over Tunnel Road, a strip of hotels and restaurants on the other side of a mountain to the east of Asheville.
What Altemeyer appears not to know and which any course in modern political history might have taught him is that those described as "conservatives" politically have long opposed the extension of State power while Leftists have justified it for assisting the poor. As mentioned previously, some historians of the British Conservative party find only skepticism and pragmatism as enduring characteristics of Conservative thought (Norton & Aughey, 1981; Gilmour, 1978; Feiling, 1953; Standish, 1990). But such skepticism leads to familiar outcomes. It has tended to lead to both suspicion of social innovations and suspicion of big government as a solution to problems -- but it has certainly not led to any rejection of change for its own sake. When an experiment has clearly failed (such as State ownership of industry) conservative pragmatism finds no difficulty in abandoning it.
Result: the judge commended the defense lawyer on his excellent work and politely requested the presence of the Scram people. I was not privy to all of what he said to them but I do know that they accepted responsibility for the mistake and it, hopefully, won't happen again.As our correspondent notes, that was an especially fine piece of lawyering by a fellow later identified as Matt Dorsen, who works for lawyer Steve Lee. But the questions raised by the example have broader implications than just for this single defendant.
Christmas Card Challenges - Twine - Now this stuff is really hard to find in Perth so I used my trusty kitchen twine I use to sew up the chicken when making roasts :$ Hey it works! So I am not knocking it lol. They also have a DT and GDT call on ATM if anyone is interested.
I then go back to bed.
Till no longer
As mentioned actual track testing is expensive, it requires the capital investment in the car and spares, as well as the running and repair costs. A driver making an error requiring repairs or a technical fault on the car, soon sees the car stuck in the garage and no track time being accrued. As result the students get less time learning about how the car is behaving. With the Simulator this can be run at any time, with little downtime and at low costs. Aside from the capital investment to buy the system, it only requires a moderate electrical power supply and can be run for around £12 a day.
Why am I using a game as source material for a feature on nostalgia, I hear you ask? Because Sonic Generations thrives on it, that’s why, and it’s the very reason that it’s got so many die-hard retro gamers excited about its impending release. For those not in the know, Generations sees everyone’s favourite blue hedgehog thrown back in time where he meets up with his chubbier, younger self. Together they decide to set off through a collection of the most memorable levels from Sonic history in order to set things back to normal. Basically, it’s an excuse to see the likes of the classic Green Hill Zone and Chemical Plant Zone levels re-imagined for the modern day, reminding you of those glorious childhood memories you may have of playing of the old Sonic games when you were young. In short, it’s a nostalgia overload, and it’s one that works to a dazzling degree.
The above photo was taken at the cutest-ever-1923 vintage-storybook-cottage-in South Pasadena anyone has ever seen-open-house! One thing though, I should have plucked an obligatory cupcake from the front because no one wanted to be the first. When I left the open house hours later I saw people eating cupcakes but the front still looked untouched. People were reaching around the back to take them off. So funny. :)
so i shuffle on my heals, and bounce on my toes
Another Month has come to an end…nope, November; the 11th month of the year has come to an end and you look around, there’s so much to be grateful for…okay, none?
Stitchin... What is it about folk art that speaks to us? I'm always drawn to the folky tulip ~ whether stitched or painted 100 years ago on an old blanket chest. Just can't help myself, anyone else suffer from this affliction? I remember an old friend who had not a single stem of anything planted in his yard. One day I asked him why not a few tulips, he replied they were too ugly! He's still my friend, my oldest in fact, I just didn't marry him:)
Every single time you look at me that way.
Paper: Whisper White, More Mustard, Pumpkin Pie, DSP (retired)
Throughout my reading and research there was the sense that the building should be preserved as a Scottish Icon, an inventive design symbolising why Scotland is so great and creating a separation from English architecture relating to the current push for independence in Scotland. So why isn’t this happening? Let us look at the history of the site.
With almost an hour and a half to think about things during my run, plenty of thoughts went through my head. Three main groups of thoughts have stayed with me after the run. The first was how important (and sometimes difficult) it is to control your pace. Especially when the miles start stacking up while building your base, it is often tempting to run all miles hard, but that’s a good path to injury on longer runs. Many times the distance and total time ran is more important than pace. As a race draws closer, that focus shifts, but I’m still too far out to make that shift yet.
Reservoir levels are up by up to 14 per cent – but still exceptionally low in the south-east – while overflowing rivers are exceptionally high at half of all measuring sites.
Desire Petroleum, a UK firm, began drilling for oil off the Falkland Islands yesterday despite strong objection by Argentina.
With a dog as his friend in the journey through life
to give to him
I have to be here for the appointments because the lady from the agency doesn't have a key. This would be fine if she would just 1.) show up at the appointed time and not an hour late OR 2.) show up, period. Twice today there were appointments where no one showed and no one called. It's not cool to be stuck in an apartment when I have a million things to do, on an eighty-degree day with no open windows on account of the flying soot problem.
The next week I met with him. He did an ultrasound and another urine test. At this point I had bled for about a week and stopped. I knew I was not pregnant, just didn't know if I ever was or if I had lost another one. He confirmed to me that I had miscarried. That sounds much more awful than it was. If I had not been having surgery, I never would have known. I didn't have much sadness with this, just disappointment. I really felt like me being pregnant that fast had been an answer to my prayers. I think now that I needed to feel like I was pregnant for those few weeks to help pull me out of my funk.
I need to digress a little -
Position your oven rack in the bottom third of the oven, and preheat to 325°. Line the bottom and sides of an 8x8 metal baking pan with foil, leaving a 2-inch overhang on opposite sides to facilitate easy removal of the brownies. Spray the foil with an even layer of nonstick spray and set aside.
Map
Recent events have made me remember that one of the reasons I dropped out of law school was that lawyers seemed just like businessmen to me. They told the same jokes, drank the same beer and ogled the same girls while they sat smoking the same cigarettes (when you could smoke cigarettes on a university campus, a hundred years ago) between classes.
Milk (especially processed milk)
For it only takes a moment to reach out to be a friend
Billy Ocean and Limahl from off of the 1980s’s Hot Potato Nights experimental supplementary spudcast is available via this site.
In a deliberate attempt to bring large-scale European-style May 1 protests to America for the first time, Occupy called for a general strike, urging workers to attend marches rather than work.
“mist” was actually blowing on my face. It was just a “wee bit chilly” out
wisdom; trusted, it is salvation; loved, it
What do I mean by this?
“5’8”. And the boys are all … so high.” Her illustrative hand hovered around our waists. We had munchkin men and monster girls.
“Is that so,” he raised an eyebrow. “In that case, I’m game. Are you girls drivin’ over there?”
exclusivity of the gospel, President Carter said a couple of very interesting things. For instance, he speaks very specifically of the fact that he believes that a personal faith and knowledge of the Lord Jesus Christ is, as he said, necessary for full salvation. For full salvation and acceptance before God. He went on and said though, “However, those who never hear will be judged upon their faithfulness in some sense to what they do though.” And he said that “He will not consign them to hell.” Well, the good news for both Jimmy Carter and Albert Mohler is that neither of us is the divine judge. However, I believe that scripture very clearly does say that there is a dual destiny. The differentiation of which has to do solely with whether one has come to a saving knowledge of the Lord Jesus Christ. The apostle Paul in Romans 10 says that “All who call upon the name of the Lord shall be saved.” But then it makes very clear that those who are saved are those who indeed hear the gospel and respond to it and believe. “Faith comes by hearing,” says Paul, “and hearing by the word of
She was an A student. A humanitarian who travelled to Africa to teach at an orphanage that housed children born to slaves. She was one of those girls who seemed to tell her mom everything.
Upgrade them!
In the end I can’t completely put a finger on why I loved this Higgins book head and shoulders above others. It made me laugh, it made me cry, and I couldn’t put it down. Pick this one up for a fun weekend read. You won’t be disappointed.
Away from truth
Today Brayton and I took Pearson into the doctor for his six month check up.
And he reeks of the stuff
Reportedly, the story of the film is about an actor who turns producer and makes it big in the industry and starts to treat his family unfairly to maintain his image. The film focuses on how people live their day to day lives not on what they see and perceive but on what others perceive them to be.
Now, decades later, Gordon is a former globe-trotting consultant with a grown son, an ex-wife, and an overwhelming desire to see Glenna again. Though she’s stunned when Gordon walks into her Manhattan office, Glenna agrees to accompany him for a drink. As the two head out into the snow-swept city, they rediscover the passion that once drew them together—before it tore them apart. And as the evening unfolds, Gordon will finally reveal the true reason for his return. . . .
i do a dance
It even has a party trick — air rings.
I always try to be uplifting with my posts, and not air too much personal grief. I just have seemed so deep into it these past few days that it’s all I know to talk about. Besides, I hope that it helps another person out there to know that he/she is not alone.
If they are really good and totally honest, expect to go through this several times. Get used to rewrites. You may pull every last shred of hair out of your head before you are finished, but know that you are sparing yourself…and others pain. Add humiliation to that list.
The parents look Middle Eastern,
For the bodice you will need some lace or embroidered net with a pretty scalloped edge/border, and it needs to be a minimum of 18cm wide (wider if you intend to do a full bust adjustment). I've included a few examples that will work here - you will notice mine are very bridal (funny that!) but they are often available in black and other colours. Lace is often made of cotton or nylon, so may be dyeable if you can't find the perfect colour.
However, the decision to place a wholesale morato-rium on the release of crime statistics received a cool reception from the Freedom of Expression Institute and media organisations.
Stop talking about the RM850 million court judgment that, because of the government’s intervention, Tajuddin Ramli does not have to pay to Danaharta.
I’ll start you off: HAA! Someone tweeted me a picture of Bernie Ecclestone in a G-String. Which one of you was it?
Solar flares mainly emit X-rays — we also get radio waves from these things, and white light in the brightest of flares. They all travel at the same speed as light, so it takes eight minutes to arrive. There are some effects from flares, such as radio interference from the radio bursts.
Do it yourself,
Although I have been working on my manuscript for two years, I have told very few people about it because I have been so afraid of having people judge me and tell me that I am not good enough. That ended a few weeks ago with my winning a query critique. This was the push I needed.
The fact is that sexual harassment law has become just another way for an army of lawyers and women - not mutually exclusive - to obtain protection money from wealthy individuals and businesses. These entities appear most of the time to settle out of court, rather than pay the exorbitant costs of defending themselves or risk the enormous damages arising out of a conviction by a female-majority jury.
"Palin": "And I can see Russia from my house."
Spider-Man 4, also known as “Spider-Man Reboot” will be out in theaters on 2012—almost 50 years after “Gagamba at si Scorpio”.
After reviewing it, he told me that he couldn’t accept me as a student, because the work wasn’t polished enough. However, he promised to reconsider if I could show him that I could revise.
shredded Mozzarella cheese, 1/4 to 1/3 cup
* You illustrated A Hen in the Wardrobe with some lovely images. A bit like the chicken and the egg - which comes first? (See what I did there!) Do you write the story first or do your drawings inspire ideas for your story?
I am constantly sore and have a few problem areas such as my lower back and hips which bother me more than others, but it is a fair trade off for the improvements i am making. I’m not gonna lie though, I am really looking forward to day 31 and 32, which will be a little break, no yoga no exercise no nothing except maybe a visit to the sweedish baths.
Not only that, but there is a "flow" between my brain and my fingers,
Jeff "Skunk" Baxter - guitar, steel guitar
Sampling the various Ikea funded means of transport, shuttle bus
śravaṇādi-śuddha-citte karaye udaya
In order to help another effectively I must understand more than he -- yet first of all surely I must understand what he understands . . . all true effort to help begins with self-humiliation: the helper must first humble himself under him he would help, and therewith must understand that to help does not mean to be a sovereign but to be a servant, that to help does not mean to be ambitious but to be patient, that to help means to endure for the time being the imputation that one is in the wrong and does not understand what the other understands.
And Obama must be beat!
Pollution was the hot button topic, a prevalent problem for everybody and everywhere you looked, people trying to do something about it:
I bleed because it brings more to my mind than the nature of my world, it brings to mind the physical sensation of losing your very life, the intimacy of the redish black tears crawling slowly down my fingers to drip onto my toes to mix with the tears and dirt of dead leaves on the dirty ground. Stripes and white all around my cherished music powers me through bringing me to the end of the tunnel, the thought process that relates all the pain and suffering, the depression and anger and then pulls me out of the tunnel with new realizations. And I hope. Or I feel more visually, my eyes itching with the thoughts and jitters of a small emotional moment. I am powered by my interpretations, which only exist by gift of others, the sounds and thoughts translated to paper and words to the empty blank lane.
Just when we thought we survived the holidays, here comes another one sneaking around the corner-Valentine’s Day. People have their opinions about Valentine’s day, some endorsing it and others dismissing it to a day dedicated to greeting cards. Fact is, it is considered an annual traditional holiday and for people in mourning, it’s a reminder of our loss. It evokes feelings of memory and traditions, tugging at our emotional boundaries.
“Do you think we got them all?” I asked.
8 Cheating Woman 3:36
Other notable moments in training last week – I am now lifting 9kg dumbbells for my bicep curls, BIG deal – I did a pretty hard core hills sprint session on the treadmill that saw me sweating terribly and very exhausted – I skipped a session on Sunday due to having been out late the night before and really just being pretty tired from having run 30km the day before.
I'm going to market a bumper sticker soon, but I can't tell you what it will say. (You might steal my idea). Where does one go to market bumper stickers?
For a BORING EGG NOODLE IN MISO SOUP?
The second argument weighed against Christianity is to claim that faith—this blind belief in the unknowable over and against reason—is to blame for a great many evils in history. All someone has to say in this argument is a phrase like: “The Inquisition,” or “Killing witches,” or, more recently, “Standing between loving gay people and their happiness in marriage.” And with a stroke the argument is made. As a Christian you are responsible for killing people who disagree with you and ruining other people’s happiness. And implied in this argument is the assertion that you are a fool for being a Christian, because Christians did those things and they were fools. Case closed.
WHACK, right in the ovaries - but a more minor variant. And in this exact general area, too: left side where I suspect my ovaries are located. It's like a throbbing, bruise-like sensation. It's not unbearable, just noticeable and has happened both times now on the injection day after the cramping occurs.
Who is a wonderful wife
6. “Ugh…disgusting blob!” (Ghostbusters)
17And he measured the wall thereof, an hundred and forty and four cubits, according to the measure of a man, that is, of the angel.
The Iberian lynx is a beautiful animal.Only 215 Iberian lynxes live all over the world. Today they only live in Spain.
'connections'...
Awards $3,000 plus publication in Exhibition Book and more.
Thus it has been enjoined herewith that in order to receive that transcendental knowledge, one must approach the guru. Therefore, if the Absolute Truth is one, about which we think there is no difference of opinion, the guru also cannot be two. The Ācāryadeva for whom we have assembled tonight to offer our humble homage is not the guru of a sectarian institution or one out of many differing exponents of the truth. On the contrary, he is the Jagad-guru, or the guru of all of us; the only difference is that some obey him wholeheartedly, while others do not obey him directly.
Honda F1 Electric KERS
Given the amount of times I hear "ahhhhh, pas possible" on a daily basis, I'd say the word "impossible" is actually pretty frickin' French to me. Like, it could be the national anthem and should be right up there with Egalité, Fraternité, Liberté et Impossibilité. No offense but, come on....vraiment?
1 integrated
‘It’s really not. If I have to come into work i-t i-s n-o-t a d-a-y o-f-f’.
Every now and then a recipe surprises me and this week’s Tuesdays with Dorrie assignment was one of those times. On first glance, this Hungarian Shortbread seemed pretty run-of-the-mill. Sugar, flour, jam, butter…..wait a minute, is that A WHOLE POUND of butter? OK, maybe this is going to be more exciting than I thought!
“Do one thing everyday that scares you.” E. Roosevelt
I wish some of you out there would tell me a nice story about something that happened to you or a story you heard.Any kind of story as long as its not too sexy or too violent.HA!Even if you just came here by accident,I wanna hear a story from you. Everyone has a story that sticks out in their minds even if its something from a book or movie they watched.You gotta have tons of them so TELL ME A STORY,please.
Grilled cheese with spinach and pancetta - saw this on Giada de Laurentiiseseseses show and my 7 year old daughter thought it looked yummy. She saw that it had spinach in it and she still wanted it! So we'll give it a try.
Did you read this up in the news this morning? While I was browsing the online news report, I kind of agree to this. From my experience of working as a office manager way back in my previous office, interviews after interviews, I can't seems to find the suitable candidates, and most of the time, it's just settling for the need of having one to fill the position due to 'emergencies'. Most of the time, the candidates will not work up to the standards / marks, with a very simple thing that they are just all lack of communication.
I am a fan of J. Adams and it seems each of her books gets better than the last. I really think you can't go wrong with this sweet short story about a love that grows as they grow older. If you are in the mood for something sweet this will leave you satisfied. It was fun to watch Dominique grow up and Marcello's love change as she did. I loved all the baking involved. Oh and Marcello has a talent for meaningful gifts! The flow of the story was flawless. I hope that Ms. Adams will one day make this a full length novel. Congrats J. Adams on another fantastic read. Loved it and will be reading this many more times.
the correct path opens up before me.
2010.09.11 Iraq Baghdad 2 4 Two Iraqis die from splinter injuries after Jihadis send rockets into a commercial district.
“Almost here,” chirps Ian, “you’ll see! This sun day’ll be different Violet.”
Pearce has bulked up quite considerably and does give the impression throughout that under the jokes and dishevelled appearance that Snow is a badass. This is highlighted when the action kicks off, but I rather like the fact that rather than skill, Snow’s major advantage comes from his resiliency, as he gets a pasting over the course of the film. But too tough, or dumb to stay down he merely dusts himself off and keeps scrapping.
The real reason you should never, ever get a dog is that life as you know it will completely change. You will worry and obsess and feel guilty when you have to leave the house. You will have outrageous bills for crazy things that you can’t now imagine like LL Bean goose-down doggie beds and stomach-pumping vet bills when your dog devours a whole Chocolate Easter bunny left carelessly within jumping range.
To thrive at its most predatory level capitalism requires a native population, a workforce, to be disempowered, for Marxism to succeed a native population not only needs to be disempowered it needs to be destroyed. This you see is where those two great evils find a common ground on which to pursue their aims.
-Plans for the future
Biblical. Relational. Missional.
The Christmas cards that get sent out?
Simple??
in the garden
To be honest, the first job I ever aspired to as a child was to be a bin lady. Note: bin lady not bin woman - I have standards. That was because I was fascinated (and still am, if you want to know) by bin lorries, or dust carts if you're from the other side of the pond. I love how they mash up the litter.
The next day, Hang Ah asked Jae Ha if something happened the night before and Jae Ha asked if he did something. Haha. She quickly said no and left leaving Jae Ha with a smirk on his face. When Hang Ah met up her comrades, rumors was spreading that she joined WOC to find herself a husband. She immediately went back to her room and confronted Jae Ha if he was spreading rumors around. Jae Ha used this is to bait her!
Art directors the world over would weep.
We had agreed that Rory should text us once a day to tell us his news. This daily text went something like this:
Blue Scholar Blog: When is the next big demonstration?
The serpent’s seductions.
The larger of the Two Maggots
Qu'on gratte tous les jeunes !
What else am I packing for 2 weeks in France? Not that you asked, but here goes:
As one musical man marries, another brawny one divorces. It gives me no pleasure whatever to hear that Arnold Schwarzenegger’s wife has given the old beef steer his marching orders, even though he has no one to blame but himself. I don’t know what possessed him to declare that mulatto women have the best behinds. His wife, who is not a mulatto, must have burned with indignation as she strained her neck to inspect her own tush in the bedroom mirror. As a woman from the Kennedy family, she might have forgiven Arnie the odd affair, but she could never tolerate him publicly scorning her charms. Apparently his remark was made on the spur of the moment, after a Brazilian samba dancer nudged him with her buttocks, but there are times when a husband should salivate in silence. A wise man never comments about the first thing that rubs against his thigh.
So whether you text, email, call, Skype or visit, keeping in contact with family is a great idea. I suggest contact once a week because this way you do not smother your family member or stay too distant.When you’re an adult, you may think that the days of reporting to your parents about everything are gone. Though, talking with them frequently can create a strong relationship and show them that you care, same with parents. If parents contact their children at least once a week, it probably would calm their nerves and allow them to show their child that they care. So, even though you may feel far away, technology is there to bridge the gap. Friends come and go, but family is forever.
I learned they can’t seize something that wasn’t paid for with “ill gotten gains”–as they referred to everything I owned that had been purchased by Ponzi scheme proceeds. So I got to keep anything not paid for with those funds. Like things purchased prior to the date the Ponzi scheme began.
The other day, I was out hunting for an autorickshaw in this crazy street of Andheri East. After being at the receiving end of the usual “NOs” of the first five autowalas, I moved on a little ahead and stood near the other miserable commuters waiting for a ride. There was this young girl (Mitrali) standing right next to me and I asked her if she was going to the station as well. “Yes”, she answered back. So, as per the mutually assumed decorum of auto hunters, we split our hunt zones and tried our luck at finding an auto that’s willing to take us. For those who are unaware of Andheri’s travelling fate, let me just tell you how it works out here – An autowala in the morning, almost assumes God status here since, it’s their “Yes” and “No” which determine whether or not we end up reporting to work on time. So yes, your convincing skills are put to test right in the morning even before you get to actually apply them on your boss.
But this life comes from Jesus and never from religion. This life cannot be found in Christianity, churchianity or in any buzz-word like community, simple church or organic church. Life will attach itself to those who join themselves to Jesus. He is life itself.
My coldframe is perking away, which always gives me hope when I pass by. I've already harvested some arugula, the radishes are growing, and the lettuces are just popping up through the soil. It's hard to think of it as May - even though the days are getting gloriously longer. With this grey, cold, weather, it just seems weird.
Jason Farris, 31, of Anderson, Mo., was sentenced April 30 by U.S. District Judge Ortrie D. Smith to 17 years and six months in federal prison without parole.
The shed is in the corner of a large field and behind this building is a pathway that leads towards his house and ours. As I peaked around the corner, I stopped in my tracks, for there stacked up was every last piece of rubbish that had been in the olive groves. The full compliment of paraphernalia had been moved from one side of the farm to another. 'Speechless' is an understatement. 'Why' was a waste of time. 'Removal', obviously not going to happen. 'French farmer logic' would say that this was a classic win/win. I would no longer see the wreckage when I walked amongst my beloved olive trees and Gérard could keep it for that long-awaited day when it might come in handy. I resisted (with the utmost self control) the temptation to ask him what use could possibly come of this 'treasure'...my Aussie non-farmer-logic thought if we hadn't found a purpose for it in the past eleven years......
Workbox/File 2:Map Puzzle
Gaily decorated and carrying her name flag, the Bluenose took to the water as her natural element, to the accompaniment of O Canada, played by the 75th regimental band and the enthusiastic demonstration of the thousands who thronged the waterfront…
and amaze the clay-pipe smoking boatman,
1. Had to say no to Jury Duty selection in fear that I would be homeless on the 12 dollars a day Jury pay.
I'm so thankful that God chose us to love & raise twins. It is such a special relationship and an awesome blessing & honor! I just love watching these two grow up together!
Zaath discovered however one day, that music could actually be played much more easily with a computer and weird machines with knobs and faders.
Tomorrow at 9 pm I will be set apart by my stake president as a full time missionary for the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter day Saints. Whoa. How am I feeling? I don't really know. :) Ecstatic, mostly. Hormonally emotional about leaving people and crying way too frequently. I get really nervous sometimes, and then remember, It is true. I have a testimony of the Gospel of Jesus Christ and that is what I need. Heavenly Father qualifies those he calls, and he will help me to be the best missionary I can be if I put my trust in him.
A Map of the Floating City is set against a dystopian vision of the 1940s that might have existed had WWII turned out a lot differently. Survivors explore a fictional Google map, forming tribes and trading relics amidst a bizarre sea-going barter society.
There's a current which spawned through the Italian Nineties, corrupted most of their music and still drenches many contemporary productions with its fetishism for decadence and corporality. I'm talking about the "alternative rock" trend encompassing anything from Afterhours to Marlene Kuntz, such plagues as Giorgio Canali, Cesare Basile, and other of their fellow sulkers.
Besides, the more you “save the day”, the more it becomes expected. Then when you fail those expectations, people start complaining that Superman is never around when you need him. Who needs that headache? If you save the occasional old lady from being hit by a car then piss-off for a few months, people will fawn all over you. Let’s not act like he doesn’t have a massive ego, prancing around in that ostentatious cape. Superman LOVES the attention.
It's kind of nice to know that a little boy is coming so all those cute boy things I searched for Kaelen to wear and use, his little brother can use. I will still have to get him a few things because the seasons are off from when Kaelen would have been born and I get to start the hunt for the perfect coming home outfit again so that's fun.
10 - Ancient Rites - (Ode to Ancient) Europa
And the crying didn’t stop. From either of them. And so I tried to juggle mixing a bottle and making breakfast. My skills were lacking, as evidenced by both of my childrens vocal performance.s
There are decisions to be made on therapy which scares me, so I know it scares my husband. Right now we rejoice and take one day at a time.
The Prime Minister was elected into Parliament when he was in his twenties. Having served in numerous capacities in the BN government for almost 40 years, the BN culture and practice are so entrenched that it is futile to hope that he has the courage and leadership quality to lift the country out of its caldron.
The tick fossil pictured is 25 million years old, but is no different from those living today. One of the most important living fossils, the ticks prove once again the Creation of God.
That warm meal that got cooked?
Whether you cheer for New England or New York (or neither!), Super Bowl Sunday is a great reason for a get-together. And to make sure you have the freshest ingredients possible for your Super Bowl party, be sure to stop by the Delray GreenMarket the day before.
How to Spot One in a Crowd: They’re the guys wandering around the park, pulling random people aside and trying to relate to them with nonsense that only makes sense to those of a similar mindset. They typically have glazed over looks and that weird salt and pepper hair color that no person has ever naturally had ever. Except for Mister Fantastic.
John, oldest cousin of the five and the only boy, enlists in the Marines. He leaves the nest before I arrive. So we sit cross- legged on the floor around the television religiously in the late afternoon to watch Gomer Pyle, USMC. Somehow watching that show makes them feel closer to their brother, less scared about him being away in the danger they imagine.
seeking that
If you saw 'em all this'll make a good toothpick, but the rest of us lumpen proles need something a lot different, like a big book with lotsa shiny pix and large print and solid descriptions/appreciations. Since that moment has long gone all we're gonna get are textbook lessons and rheumy reminiscences, which might do a lotta good for Jill Johnson if she hasn't dyked herself outta existence but does practually nada for curious cubes like myself!
HHJ Simon Brown QC writes on Costs Control with the heading Costs management and docketing judges: are you ready for the big bang next year? The “big bang” referred to is the wide-ranging package of reforms recommended, and subsequently promoted, by Lord Justice Jackson, and specifically costs budgeting and the acceptance, like it or not, that technology must play an important part both in user interface with the court and in the disclosure of documents.
5) Ready to serve.
Emma will have cookies to sell on Saturday, February 5th. We can't sell before that date, but if you want to tell me if you're interested in buying some, then leave a comment here, send me an email, or call me. Emma will then contact you on February 5th (or after) and make arrangement for you to buy cookies. Thanks for supporting the Girl Scouts!
Sources & Bibliography
The verdicts?
I didn’t think about it too much as I had to focus on the harrowing drive ahead of me. I needed my mind right to ward off the evil schemes of my murderous car.
Let me just tell you Mrs. Mint is a b***h to photograph!! It either looked more green, or more blue than it really is, ugh. The best and most accurate picture I was able to get of it was with my cell phone (it'll be the last picture).
It was 11:00pm by the time we finished dinner. All of that day Suji did not let me spend a paisa on food every time we went out to eat. And there was no point arguing, you can pay when I come to Bangalore, he’d say. Back at his place I packed up for the next day, I’d bought some juice and cake and everything seemed set by the time I went to sleep at 11:30pm. But the next morning was far from smooth.
Then mama said "that man's slow as Christmas but he sure does like kraut". I hit the ground laughing, I'd held it as long as I could without a doubt.
(Written on November 18, 2010)
There is much to be praised in The Rest is Silence. It is, indeed, an accomplishment. Still, it failed to engage me as much as I wanted, and this has had me thinking about the creation of suspense needing to be located in an intimacy with the characters and their lives (a “magnetism”, as Elizabeth Bowen has put it) and not necessarily with the interest of the plot. Even a plot as interesting as this one.
Hungarian Brand Salami, Bend - (Glen Ellyn, IL)
5) A number of Newt Gingrich’s wives, ex-wives and mistresses threatened to come forward with information about their relationships with Herman Cain, unless Cain drops out of the campaign and endorses Gingrich.
Allegiances shift when the brothers finally track down Warm and realise that the Commodore’s tracker Morris is now in cahoots with him. The Sisters follow the pair out to a gold claim, and at this point De Witt reveals his skill at character development that is not smothered in disingenuousness or irony. This section is really where the novel finally found a heart to match its cleverness. The Sisters Brothers is an intelligent, well crafted novel. If my own preference is for something a little more earnest and honest in its exploration of the human heart and mind (especially having caught a glimpse of de Witt’s perfect aim in this regard), the critics thought it was pretty much perfect as it stood: The Sisters Brothers won both the Governor General’s and the Writers’ Trust awards last year.
Within two hours, the chutes were finally removed, the passengers all taken to the terminal, or East Surrey hospital in a couple of cases I read about the next day, and we were once again asked to fasten those seat belts, heard the engines throttle up and made our way at a pace down the secondary, or emergency runway as I always call it, passing over the still stricken Virgin Airbus on the main runway at about 250 feet.
Perales: My book explores the birth, evolution, demise and collective memory of Smeltertown from the perspective of those who built it: generations of Mexican and Mexican American workers and their families. What I argue is that Smeltertown was not a place that just “existed,” but rather was a place that had to be made and remade by different groups of people, at different points in time.
There are ad agencies that are specialists at this. They have learned how to talk the talk and walk the walk. They are very successful.
"What's wrong!"
Black floral embroidered skirt-JJill via the Thrift Store :)
By this time I'm getting kind of tired of that. You might have guessed. The knucklehead starts running his mouth as soon as I walk in the door.
Dolls were sent to her in Australia to model potential dress designs for her to choose. Rather ingenious really. Her journey to France as described is extraordinary. Coaches with chandeliers! What a rattle they must have made. She was then forced to strip naked to step onto French soil on an island in the Rhine River, as a symbolic rebirth as a future French Queen leaving behind her Austrian self.
Over the past few months, a couple of contests have certainly been exposed to a wide audience: the Sobol Contest and Gather.com's First Chapters Writing Competition. So maybe it's not surprising that someone has decided to do a little borrowing. What do you get when you take Gather.com's first three chapters concept and combine it with Sobol's excessive entry fee and unpleasant stipulations for winners? Premiere Fiction, a contest that invites initial submission of the first three chapters, has an entry fee of $125 (no, that's not a typo), and takes publication rights to the winners' manuscripts.
In 1989, he appeared as File:Jimmy Durantein the musical bio DURANTE. It was playing in San Francisco during the earthquake. Excellent in the role but Durante’s life was uneventful and the musical closed on the road.
My 100 year old bed is too high for Sampson to jump up on and he waits patiently for me to get him down. He likes to sleep in and isn't in a hurry to eat his breakfast. He'd rather get up in our chair, the over-sized velvety recliner filled with pillows and and a soft purple cover. While he settles in I finally go back into the kitchen to make my coffee. It is now 8:45. The animals are all fed and cared for before the beans are ground, and in the moment when I scoop coffee beans out of the bag and into the grinder I am suspended in a kind of bliss, the pungent fragrance of the freshly roasted beans a subtle awakening of the senses. I fill the espresso machine with water, I watch it drip into the pot, I froth the milk and pour first epresso then foamy milk into an oversized mug. The next moment lingers, stretches out over timeless time as the second hand of the clock clicks from one second to the next. In bliss I have taken my first sip of coffee. There is foam on the tip of my nose.
If you are interested in purchasing this book, please consider supporting The Book Buff by purchasing from the following Amazon link. Thank you!
It crystallised a feeling that quite a few of us had, that American books for teens get a lot more attention than British ones, even in the UK. We go into bookshops and see special displays of imported YA books from the US. We see publicists for UK publishers promoting the latest transatlantic buy-in. And we suspect that YA is almost defined by that Mean Girls/Twilight High School feel, the proms, the basketball games, the road trips, so that reading about British kids doing GCSEs and watching EastEnders somehow feels all wrong.
Cream cheese (they weren't really crazy about the one that had this in it, but your mileage may vary - YMMV)
I HAVE RULES ABOUT RELATING TO ME AND RECEIVING MINISTRY THROUGH ME.
And for those of you who are bloggers, you know what I mean: There’s this way creepy thing called a “comment,” which, when it appears, can inspire some sideways squinting and breath-holding until you realize — phew! — it’s a friendly one.
You can say anything you want here. But if you get stupid I reserve the right to point it out, call you lots of inventive names and laugh like hell.
Side effects that can possibly happen:
Mix all the ingredients into a lovely gooey dough with warm water.
By "blahs," what I mean is this somewhat controversial syndrome called PANDAS. PANDAS stands for "Pediatric Autoimmune Neuropsychiatric Disorders Associated with Strep" (which is, upon examination, a rather tortured acronym, but whaddya gonna do). She was diagnosed with it a couple years ago, by the nutty West Austin doctors that specialize in this sort of thing (e.g. ADHD, autism, Tourette's).
Thank you, Annie, from Learn At Every Turn, for this award! She has a great blog with lots of science resources, as well as stuff for other subjects.
God save Fu Manchu, Moriarty and Dracula,
Mary Sheridan is a 37-year-old mother of four who has lived at Dale Farm in Essex – the UK’s largest Traveller community – for the past 12 years. Along with other Dale Farm families and their supporters, she was involved in resisting the action by Basildon Council to forcibly evict them from the land that they own. With nowhere else to go since the eviction in October 2011, the displaced families have been living in precarious, crowded and unsanitary conditions next door to their former homes. They now face the threat of another round of evictions.
window boxes full of flowers
Check out our yield on the annual from this year's E3 on the special, hour-long Adventure 44 of the Bold Nutz Podcast, complete with an epic, game-related agreeable score!
Seriously.....
The list of artists and thinkers to have spoken and performed at BAM is staggering, and a testament to just how deep its history goes. They include Mark Twain, Booker T. Washington, Frederick Douglass, Jacob Riis, Helen Keller, Isadora Duncan, Oscar Wilde, Sarah Bernhardt, Enrico Caruso, H. G. Wells, Edna St. Vincent Millay, Winston Churchill, Thomas Mann, Gertrude Stein, Aldous Huxley, Frank Lloyd Wright, Bertrand Russell, Eugene O’Neill, Mikhail Baryshnikov, Morgan Freeman, Cate Blanchett, and a string of U.S. Presidents, including both Roosevelts.
Silverman J, Kline J, Hutzler M, Stein Z, Warburton D. Maternal employment and the chromosomal characteristics of spontaneously aborted conceptions. J Occup Med 1985; 27: 427-438.
P x
close up: picked and ready to dry
toast
It's Friday night, 8:00 p.m., we're staying in the Quarter, and we are already in our jammies. Feeling only slightly pathetic about this.
May Play Group classes will be here before you know it (May 10 and 11), so NOW is the time to sign up. I'd LOVE to have you come to one of them, host one in your home with your friends, or even participate long distance. I'm confident you would enjoy what we do and be very happy with the projects you make! Keep reading...
I mentioned that the breeze here has been chilly in the evening. Crazy, irresponsible me for not seeing that a lightweight cotton dress and pinafore does not a cozy dolly make. Poor Holly Hobby was positioned near a window where all night long she would silently shiver. I'd find her smiling in the early morning sunlight, uncomplaining. So, the white home spun vest that I knit to match the colorful one that keeps the bear cozy, now sports a clay apple button and keeps Holly Hobby cozy! I'm pretty sure her smile will be even brighter tomorrow morning...
Hey, wait! Get back here! Come on...I know: this is the same Shirley L. Jones who was in Black Devil Doll From Hell, and no, her acting has not improved in the least. In fact, the only thing different about her is the fact that she brushed her hair. But if I had to watch this movie to review it, then you're gonna read the whole thing. Now toughen up and read on.
Protection sports evaluate a dog’s ability to protect both himself and his (or her) handler. The tests and trials of the various protection sports are based on the overall temperament of the dog. That is, the dog must be protective, but also safe for the handler and public and responsive to the handler’s commands. Dogs may be trained for personal protection, for work (police and military), or for sport.
Then I open the door. Not one, not two, but four delivery guys greet me with open arms and cheers! They all laugh, handing me a double order of food as they explain that a nearby street with a similar name also has a number the same as ours. We laugh and smile at each other and I realise, with irony, that I can understand what they are saying. I even join in a little.
Well, I’ve been travelling a heck of a lot, in the past six weeks I’ve been in Belgium, Bristol, Czech Republic and the People’s Republic of Cornwall! But let me take you back to September first...
Basically what I did was take the green & blue gelato sticks and rubbed them onto white cardstock. I spritzed some water on it, then used my finger to smear it around to mix the colours together. I did this a few more times until I got the effect I liked. Once it dried, I spritzed it with Glimmer Mist (Pixie Dust) to give it a shimmer. I WISH you could see it in real life, it is really pretty!!!!
It’s going to be more and more pain for the IT Companies. These companies are taking clients for a ride on resources, with rates that are way too high compared to the skill levels offered.
It was already obvious that, two years ago, the German policy on feed-in tariffs for electricity generated from photovoltaics was in trouble. With a tariff eight times higher than the wholesale electricity price at the power exchange and more than four times the feed-in tariff paid for electricity produced by on-shore wind turbines, it clearly could not last.
However awesome telling my coworkers was, telling our church really was a huge highlight! After that 8 week ultrasound, Jordan started announcing to the students that we were having a "Super Secret Special Guest" on April 22. He announced it sunday morning, wednesday night, basically anytime we were around a group of students or adults, we'd make sure they knew to be at church on April 22. We were both a steel trap, and didn't give away a single hint about our Big Guest. We got tons of guesses - TONS of guesses. After hearing some of them, I was honestly worried that our big guest would be a disappointment... I mean, Tim Tebow? Shane & Shane? Francis Chan, Bethany Hamilton, John Piper, Jeremy Lin, Chris Tomlin... We heard lots of big names.
And boy, I was wrong – I’ve grown to love this tiny space of mine, and of course, it didn’t happen overnight.
Luckily for me, the Internet has made my life shine a little brighter thanks to the ability to chat with fellow "Zonies," one of them being the inestimable and all-around fantastic fan of the dark side, Steven Phillip Senski. I met Steven through his wondrous blog Heart in a Jar (don't let the post dates fool you... there's a whole trove of fantastic writing on the genre there waiting to be found). Through Facebook Steven and I got to talking more, but our shared passion-cum-obsession with Mr. Serling was clearly made evident last July Fourth when the Sai-Fai Channel aired its TZ marathon for that holiday.
After going around for what felt like one hundred times (ok, perhaps I am exaggerating too much), I prayed that God will put an end to my misery. Then something happened. There was this one driver (he probably saw me and my car with no luck in finding a parking spot) who suddenly waived to pull me over to the side. I stopped, rolled down the window and he said, “Please just take my spot, and let me go around and try to find another parking spot.”
Plus, if my recipes are makeovers of old pre-veg favorites, then, of course, they have to have the original name in them somewhere or how will anyone know what it is I am trying to recreate in a compassionate, cruelty-free way? If I call my recipe Chickpea Salad and not Chickpea “Tuna” Salad, then how will anyone know I am attempting to recreate the tuna fish salad and sandwiches that many people, including myself, loved before becoming vegetarian or Vegan? Some people may feel disgusted by the thought of eating anything that reminds them of animal foods but there are many, many people, again including myself, who miss the foods they used to eat and appreciate a way to satisfy those cravings with Vegan foods that are familiar to their senses and their memories.
Obama reserved his harshest words for House Republicans as he called on them to join him in breaking a “stalemate” and forging a compromise that balances cuts in government spending with new tax revenues from the wealthy and corporations.
I sighed. What bullshit.
Let me tell you, getting these shots was a bit of an adventure! I was standing on a bridge for a few, and I had to hike down a sketchy bank to get some of the others. My husband was busy fishing, so I crossed a bridge and decided to head down towards the water. Half way there, all of the different kinds of poisonous snakes in the region started to run through my mind… cotton mouth, coral, rattle… alligators… bums. You never know what you could run into in a thicket around the swamp! Of course, I had only worn flip-flops. I quickly clicked off some photos and started to adjust my shot, promptly snagging myself with a vine around my ankle – freaked out – but forced myself to be strong and stay down there. (Mostly because I wanted some shots of this location, and was positive I did not want to come back and hike on that bridge or climb down that bank ever again haha!) The sun was setting, and I hoped for some pretty colors on the water; I wish some of these shots would have come out a bit better. Overall though – it was a fun little trip and I’m happy with my documentation of the area.
OOOkay, If you say so.
The marzipan figures are rather amateur compared to to the creations of some of my facebook friends (seriously, some of you should bake for a living), but the kids are quite happy with my creation, especially the tiny marzipan avatar of the dog gamboling in the snow.
Tami often talks about her dude that she has been with for over four years. She admits that she doesn’t make it a point to put him on public display but, she doesn’t go out of her way to hide him either. Meet Tami’s Haitian beau when you click below.
I’m also an amateur photographer and an experienced artist using MS Paint.
Verdict: Siganeui Choom is a meditative and thought-provoking documentary rather than a fact-filled one, giving a glimpse into the rather personal histories of the first Korean immigrants to Cuba while giving rise to difficult-to-answer questions about the diasporic experience and split identities.
These 2 Hexagon Flowers arrived today from Lara in Australia together with a small chrochet heart and a postcard wirth pictures. One of the pictures with a beach are named Denmark, why I do'nt know?
Centeroo is Bonnaroo's village. It's where all of the stages and tents are, the ferris wheel, the majority of vendors - food, clothing and art. You're lucky (or paid for VIP) to have a campsite that's only a 10-15 minute walk to Centeroo, but then Centeroo itself can take 20 minutes to walk from one end to the other. So once you're in, you're there for several hours, if not the whole day (or night). It's wise to pack well.
Ziggy had lost....but Ziggy had won!
- the rest 1/2 egg, beaten
Now I can have SONY VEGAS to edit so I can finally upload it.
We purposely omitted to show you all the DT projects for this challenge so that you will be amazed and awed as you hop along all the blogs. The hop starts at 9am on May 4th and will end at 9pm on May 5th. You must leave a comment on each of the participating blogs in order to qualify to win one of the grand prizes:
The thing is, while of course I am pissed off and want my order or my money back part of me is worried about veronica. When people just disappear from the internet I can't help but think that something bad has happened, especially as the last few tweets from Veronica (from December) say that she's been sick and had
Evil Hubby is away on business. I think I’ve mentioned the fact several times. Not only away on business, but in Switzerland. Not South Carolina, Hutchinson MN, Japan or China like normal. Switzerland.
“I don’t know,” I defend, but what I should say is, “Well, you develop an instant chemistry with someone when they watch you puke. We’re bonded for life now.” But I don’t . I don’t have to because I am saved by the bell. I won’t see Summer again until after school. I hope that by then she’ll forget the familiarity in that smile.
I’m sure you can see where this is going.
Close up on the band of the hat. Also trying to capture the transparency of silk and gauze, mostly through the use of warm and cool hues, and control on edges. There is some impasto happening too in the high lights where I even threw in Cadmium Yellow Lemon.
There was an entire neighborhood devoted to luxury car dealerships. Not just one BMW dealership, but competing BMW dealerships, and Cadillac, and Lexus, and Rolls, and Ferrari. After awhile you simply don't care anymore. Yeah, there's another Lincoln dealership, whatever. But our interest in late-model cars is pretty jaded anyway since we've owned so many vehicles over the years. Once you've owned and driven a vintage luxury barge from the Golden Days of Automotive Excess, a brand-new status car just doesn't have that much appeal. We're so cool.
#11 The Velvet Underground and Nico by Joe Harvard
I love and cherish friendship.
10:15 AM: Still hungry. Eggs aren’t out of the question, right?
returned to the entertainment world shortly after. He died in 1972 after
I am the depository for unused fabric with all my friends. From my house unused scraps go to a church quilting group, and to preschool and elementary teachers for art use.
Now we have an official government announcement that the UK has decided to make academic research available for free on the internet. Now you’re talking. This could be highly disruptive for the publishing industry which has long come under fire for the high prices users have to pay for access to articles the publishers have obtained for free covering what, in many cases, is publicly funded research. That said, the FT does point out that top academics do enjoy the prestige that comes with publishing their peer-reviewed papers in such journals as Nature and The Lancet.
Nella prossima estate, viaggeranno in Europa, Inghilterra, Francia, Germania, Italia e altri paesi.
For those that don't care for nuts, a few M & M's or another pretzel makes a great topper too!
Or almost.
1/4 cup brown sugar
Gauge your interests: What do you spend more time on?
What’s your style? Jesse says, “We’re a DIY hard core/metal core band”. He lists their influences as a wide range of artists and bands, who span every genre. He comments, “We don’t try to act or sound like any other band, but our favorite artists include Bury Your Dead, For the Fallen Dreams, The Wonder Years and Stick to Your Guns, with the occasional 98 Degrees and O-Town”. For appearance, Jesse contributes, “our vocalist Christopher Schott likes to rock his Lady Gaga and N’Sync T’s whenever possible”.
Watching hours of a really good show does something to me. I care more deeply about the characters than I did when I only saw them once a week. Combine that with sleep deprivation and I got practically weepy by the end of it all. Damn but it's a good show and anyone who scoffs at the idea that a television show can be art is dumb and mean and I don't like them.
The seller was engaged in a lengthy telephone conversation while we explored his boxes, but once he was done, we approached him and he turned out to be very friendly. He told us these had all come from a typewriter repairman, now in his 90s, who had retired from the business 20 years ago and was now clearing out the rest of his store. We were both thrilled that there was a typewriter repairman in Geneva, even if he was retired, but the fellow assured us he was in no state to receive visitors, sadly.
While browsing through what Derwent have to offer, you can help but get a certain localised feel about the list of authors who have used their publishing services. This may very well be the appeal Derwent have for their authors.
Stage One
2000: 4.17% ABV
So, here's the rub...how can we spread the word? What can we say that will express to people the import of this message? For now, I am adding a badge/photo to my side bar that will link to this post. I ask you all to feel free to do the same. Let's get people thinking about this. Let's start a revolution. I want this to spread. I want to get the word out. For our children, and all children. Maybe one day people will all show children the respect they deserve.
University. He was a longtime friend of Tim Russert, the
And when thy heart began to beat,
I feel like I wasnt really ready for a mission before I left but that I'm really learning a lot here and that I will be a great missionary
“My friend’s cheekbone was crushed. They attacked us with glass and burnt us with lit cigarettes. My face is burnt and totally disfigured. Worst of all, I really hated their racist comments.”
So you can imagine my excitement yesterday when I received my email from Lisa (PCJ owner/DT coordinator) welcoming me to the Team! I even woke my mom up calling her to tell her! haha I'm looking forward to having fun with my new teamies and getting to work with our sponsors. Even better, I am looking forward to making many more cards and, more importantly, making more friends on this papercrafting adventure!
Update: Here's a video showing Bridges' amazing capacity. For anyone wishing to try it, it's a rep scheme of 3 100 lbs thrusters, 3 chest to bar pullups, then 6/6; 9/9 and just keep going for 7 minutes. He ended up finishing the round of 21 and then got 1 thruster!
Kim's layout is so fun! I just love the Jump For Joy kraft paper as a background. The frames cut from patterned paper around the photos looks awesome, and I just love the way that Kim layered all of the strips. It looks as fun as her trip was! :)
Farewell 2007, Clean slate in 2008.
The College of Charleston Sports Network will produce 11 games this season that will be broadcast locally on WMMP or WTAT. Those games also will be available on ESPN3, a streaming Internet service that reaches more than 70 million households worldwide and is available in 85 percent of U.S. homes. Some games also might be carried on ESPN FullCourt, a pay-per-view service available on cable systems.
Jon Bon Jovi – John Francis BonGiovi
Red Hot Chili Peppers
The olive bar resembled a game of Duck, Duck, Goose, with patrons circling the kalamatas like anxious predators.
They related that their grandfather had told them that the victims’ families had asked that all clothing belonging to the victims should be burned. But he could not bring himself to eliminate the child’s shoes. He saved them in a drawer in his desk and wrote on the bottom: “Shoes of the only baby found. SS Titanic 1912.”
"No, cinnamons."
In a sense, it’s a good thing because it means the word is getting out about just how bad HFCS really is. On the other hand, most people are not as in-tune to the real motives of these associations as you are. What these ads are really about: money.
Other than that, I can’t complain. Little Joe has been a wonderful little guy so far (knocks on wood).
The report is not coded “P“.
*I wasn’t paid or reimbursed for this. I just thought I’d share.
I hope everyone enjoyed their Holiday with their families and loved ones. Today I wanted to share with you one of my other favorite things; A unique baby mobile I made for my son before he was born. This project was a true labor of love. I seem to take on these projects where I think to myself, "I'm not going to buy that! I am going to make it!" Then I begin making it and realize why people buy it!
When I try to show them
A part of me wasn’t ready to let go of the pre-mommy me. I realize now that I’m a much better me and can’t imagine our life without Celeste, yet in those first few weeks, deep down inside, there was a part of me that didn’t want to let go of the me from 20 – 36. I remember one day in particular, probably around 7 weeks after giving birth, I was home alone with Celeste, my husband had gone back to work, and it was one of those days where I was going from one continous cycle of feeding, burping, changing diaper…feeding, burping, changing diaper, over and over. I was exhausted and cranky and went to the restroom and saw my disheveled look, my body looked warped, every part of me was aching and healing and I started to get tears in my eyes, and then, as I glanced in the mirror again I saw out of the corner of my eye the reflection of one of our wedding pictures from the wall behind me in the hallway, and I burst into tears. And I thought…where is that person in this new one? I was definitely not ready to say goodbye!
This was an experiment for me this year, but I will use this as a growing method for next spring… definitely successful!
Mama Mio Boob Tube Bust & Neck Firmer - Silly, I know, but I actually really enjoyed this. I used this on my arms because well, who doesn't need help there? And I could see some great results. I have not tried it on my "breasts" or neck but I have heard it works great there too.
I will be the first to admit I am a toy hoarder. I think it goes back to when I was young and I had the first Barbie doll. The first one. She was wearing a black and white bathing suit. My mom gave away all of our toys to the church when we were older. She didn’t even ask us. We just came home from high school one day and she announced that she gave our toys to our church. How non-christian. Thou shalt not steal and all.
Alternatively, you can also peel the skin and then cut the fish into 3 and cook it in gravy such as “Lemak cili padi”, another local Malay dish (fish in spicy coconut gravy).
With the pencil, you draw a squiggly line, take your finger off the iPad and Touchdraw makes it smooth - try writing your signature. You can then tap on the stroke icon to change the width, colour and ends of the line.
I hadn’t been to a Macca’s for a while because although I don’t mind their food, they’re not designed or meant for the hours-long dining-out I usually prefer – but tonight, a modest meal was all I needed.
Lewis Schaffer: Mmmm Delicious ­­ Joanne
Lowlights – Dana white’s motivational speech. Couldn’t tell what he was saying mostly, due to all the beeped out swearing. The sobbing Geordie – pull it together man.
Except one day everything changes and Jack decides not to be her friend anymore. He even becomes close with the kids who bully Hazel. Hazel is sure Jack would never just change for no apparent reason and something must be wrong. How could she possibly lose him. When Jack acts cold to her I thought about what Hazel must be going through and I was close to tears.
Edmondson: We’re very proud of the fact that we had this little man from the special FX department who kept sending us videotapes of different kinds of vomit, different colours and different textures of vomit. Instead of being a special effects coordinator or whatever his title was on the film we gave him the credit ‘Vomit Technician’. I think it’s the first film ever with a Vomit Technician (both laugh).
Record: 28-6
I found this raw strawberry pie recipe on a blog about a year ago and finally got to making it. I made 5 pies total and shared with my raw community here in Portland. It was a smashing success! So many people wanted the recipe for themselves. If you are looking for a delicious, springtime, healthy dessert, give this one a try! It is actually more like cheesecake than a traditional fruit pie but delicious nonetheless.
What in the world are we going to do with ourselves? Riiiiight?
Villages like Fairacre have their own rich lore, and Miss Read tells a dozen tales here, most of them told to her by other villagers. (Who knew Fairacre had its own ghost?) Lighthearted, often funny, sometimes mysterious, these stories provide another way to spend a few hours in Fairacre. (I am now collecting these books for my own shelf, keeping an eye out for them every time I visit a used bookstore.)
Phone: (760) 597-9012
Bringing me to the reason why I like winter more than spring. Don't get me wrong; I love the warmth, sunshine, and longer days of spring. However. You can't eat outside in spring without feeling like something is crawling on you. I guess I've not yet gotten to that point in summer where I no longer care about the bugs. Still getting used to things flying and buzzing and crawling on me.
“This is not a dirty job, I do not go through back doors and I do not have any illicit dealings with the photographers. I have never done pornographic shots nor taken part in any sexual transactions.”
It's a lifelong thing, I know. This learning. This loving. This living a good life. I intend to be open to it.
I have been wanting to be one for a while now and so glad that I decided to if your not familiar with beachbody you can click on my link below but they are the makers of turbofire, p90x and insanity and many many more. Turbofire is the program that I am doing now and I love it so much! Today starts my week four on the program and I am so happy with the results that I have seen with my eating right and following the workouts. I have only missed one workout and that was last night : ( I was a little disappointed but I was super exhausted when I got home from work and fell asleep around 730 LAME! But I am making up for it today. Here is a little preview of what turbofire is
The projected residential market rate rental and condominium prices that the developer relied on when they originally underwrote the deal are substantially above the current market. They created their projection in 2006, a time that in retrospect is considered to be the top of the last real estate cycle.
Her words were comforting. Like Foer’s friend who finds it harder and harder to sleep at night and yet finds more and more meaning in her days, there is a cost for being hungry, being exhausting, being changed but unchanging. It is a restless way to live, but it is the most rewarding for ourselves and our world as long as our restlessness provokes action, sparks conversations, creates an opening for something new and needed to be born into the world.
Weekends mean pancakes to me, so this weekend I decided to try something new. I had heard good things about almond flour, and decided it was time to give it a try. Almond flour is a gluten-free, high protein, low carb flour that offers a sweet and nutty flavor to your baking. It also provides the same health benefits as regular almonds. It is high in monounsaturated fats which are associated with a reduced risk of heart disease. It is also packed with the antioxidant vitamin E. Almonds also contain magnesium and potassium. If that’s not enough for you, almonds have also been shown to decrease after-meal rises
Be Blessed!
Question the Mt. SAC teammates and coaching staff and they will tell you otherwise.
That is not to say that the animation industry is just for children, because it really isn’t. Nearly all animated features have entertainment value that specifically relates and applies to adults. However, there is that stigma that animated movies are aimed just for kids, yet adults watch them and recite them verbatim. But the minute they get a weird look from another grown up for quoting Beauty and the Beast the first response is always, “I watched it with my daughter last week, sorry.”
But some time afterwards Gunnlaug met the king, and told him of the money-lending. The king answered, “Now hast thou thriven little, for this is the greatest robber and reiver; deal with him in no wise, but I will give thee money as much as thine was.”
So anger, guilt, thinking: these are all hot button topics for me. I see the current, I see what’s being dispensed, what’s being offered out there psychologically and spiritually on the open market—in books and blogs, et cetera—and it’s frightening! It’s Cheetos for the brain, Twinkies for the soul; it’s really bad and sloppy advice that’s being proffered.
LR: The answer to that question changes constantly. I’ve met so many authors since I was published, it would be invidious to single one out, so I’ll say Shakespeare. That can’t offend anyone, can it?
I'm not going to muck about here. When you get a beer that says 1000 IBU on it you know your going to get bitterness, that or it's ironic, being a backlash against some of the mega-bitter beers being produced for bitterness sake (hop, hop, and hop again ad infinitum).
The little guy is a mama's boy all the way. While he loves to play with his daddy, when the night comes to a close, he wants his mama to read stories, say prayers, and snuggle before going to bed.
This is the same handle that tweeted that Joe Hart will be fit to be recalled for this weekend’s match against Newcastle United, after being rested in Manchester derby. He also tweeted that he tried drinking from a Liverpool FC mug yesterday, but it was impossible because it kept sliding down the table.
And now, if you will excuse me, I need to go and have a word with my idiot cat and try and persuade him that cats don’t growl at postmen. He’s been doing that a lot lately. If I wanted someone to growl at the postman, I would get a dog.
“After Vietnam, Congress swore it would never again be duped into war, and even wrote a new law — the War Powers Act — to ensure it would not repeat its mistakes. But no law can force a Congress to stand up to the president. No law can make senators read the intelligence that showed the president was overstating the case for war. No law can give Congress a backbone if it refuses to stand up as the co-equal branch the Constitution made it.”
“I’m serious, Su.”
I have been meaning to do an epic post about the incredibly boss jacket Jeff got me for my birthday, and also how I am trying to bring back using "boss" as slang, and also "do me a solid." But in order to fully express the bossness of said jacket, which makes me look like I belong in a circa-1992 Sassy magazine, also known as My Sartorial Goal For All Time, I have to convince Jeff to do me a solid (see? sounds so natural) and take my picture, preferably in a series of catalog poses in front of public fountains and soft-focus lampposts.
on July 17, 1936, marking the official start of the Spanish Civil War. It was in this period of wartime instability that the anarchist revolution materialized. In the days following the coup, the CNT mobilized the workforce to take control of the factories, foundries, and transportation infrastructure, as well as organizing militias. Noam Chomsky summarizes (better than I can) the revolution in his
That night, in terrible distress I curled up in bed in a tight ball sobbing
This set is for my February secret sister. The theme is HEARTS! So perfect, right? LOL I am working on other stuff to go with the card. Unfortunately, I don't have any more of the papers I used here. :( I usually try to match and coordinate a set but I guess not this time! LOL Hope my secret sister will like it anyway!
Could we see her face, be sure we should not know her,
■ used exclusively or almost exclusively for carrying on your business
agreed to be my first guest in the interview series.
On a more serious note, I did find, for me, that minimalism could slip over into Giving Up and Not Making an Effort - for example, I won't wear my watch as I have the time on my mobile phone; I won't wear jewellery as what does it do? I won't put together a different outfit I'll just keep on wearing the same jeans. I think to embrace the ascetic side of minimalism you need to be a very buoyant, committed person. Ultimately I like my inner landscape to have a scattering of fripperies and frivolities, they keep me happy and prevent me howling with existential angst in the middle of the supermarket (or at least snatching scones from the nearest old age pensioner in the overcrowded bread aisle); I guess I am deeply superficial.
You must use something digital!
Hop Frog is another getting even story, but I honestly find it more endearing than The Cask of Amontillado. It strikes me as a bite-sized Princess Bride and is endearing even if it’s also dark and dire.
I will spare you the pics of my travel outfit which consisted of some stretchy gap fashion workout pants and a tank top and jacket (9 hour overnight flight requires comfort).
Except in Your presence and before Your face.
The music videos I've always enjoyed the most are those that tell a story, and I've only seen a few that have been more enjoyable that this Meatloaf, action-film inspired video for "I'd Lie for You."
Thank you so much for coming to visit us! You still have until Friday, April 22, Friday at 11:59PM EST to submit your entries for our Sketch 111.
They told the Native Commissioner that they and their children and all the vaShawasha who were living in different places would not come to Shambare as their chief. After this meeting they went back to their homes and Shambare went back to his home on Chishawasha Mission farm. Shambare became sick and he died in the year 1916. He left three sons, Chimbindi, Chindinya and Vito. The Native Commissioner called Chidziva, Nyava, Chihuri, Makumbe, Gwindi, Chikaka, Chikowore, Chavunduka, Gutsa, Gusha, Gutu, Mashonganyika, Mutimumwe, and many others to Goromonzi office. The Native Commissioner killed three oxen and gave them bags of mealie meal to eat.
I could keep going but I thought it might be more fun to open the floor and let you guys share your favorite tips for Paris? Any tips for my next visit? ;o)
The brand operates in the luxury space, with dresses and jewelry easily pricing in the $400 range. While luxury retail has bounced back sharply from the recession, outpacing the rest of the apparel industry, Betsey’s retail stores’ audience skews younger, which put the chain in competition with lower-priced retailers.
“The present report extends these studies by identifying for the first time a presumably synthetic chimeric retrovirus as a contaminant. This gene-modified organism seems to have replicated and spread intensely in a broad set of cell lines for several years without being noticed.
“Right TEAM gather” Ted calls.
So, to start, I went down to our local dollar store and picked up 3 plastic piggy banks per child: one blue, one yellow and one pink. I came home and wrote give, my child’s name, a big 10%, and drew some pictures to convey the concept with a permanent marker on a the yellow bank for each child. I did the same for the save and spend banks (for save I wrote 30%, and for spend I wrote 60%). Each child then had their own give, save, and spend piggy banks.
It might take time to heal, but you don't have to let the bad stuff stop you. Somehow the hope survives, even if you look like a masochist. Hope's plucky like that.
We cannot be good. We are not inherently good. We need a Savior – not just to get us into the afterlife. We desperately need a Savior here, now, day by day and moment by moment. We have no hope of living righteously if he is not the one living in us and through us. We have no hope of pleasing God if we do not put our complete trust in Jesus .
~Praising God in every single situation. No matter how I feel!
Look at engravings of numerous executions by guillotine: the executioner is never hooded. Change that.
Me - Oh honey, it's not because of the tattoo, it's just because he's a grown up now.
But sadly, stuffing my face with sweet and savory, carb loaded brunch foods can't be an everyday thing. Which is why I ended my fun weekend prepping my usual clean eating foods for this week when I got home.
There’s no shame here, no running away from what the program or story is trying to accomplish. So often during the runs of the Fifth and Sixth Doctor it felt like the writers didn’t even want to be writing a DOCTOR WHO story. Especially during the Saward/Baker II years, it often felt like the Doctor was a guest star in his own program. I’ve never felt that way about the Seventh Doctor’s run, but there are stories – the preceding story, GHOST LIGHT, and here in FENRIC – where the Doctor seems to slide into the background.
But as on Day 70 of my challenge, I attended my first true Brazilian birthday party of the year, at an infantil buffet no less, I decided to approach it different. I decided to approach it like a Brazilian.
Enjoy your win, to find out how to claim your prize please email me (Zoe) clicking the link will open an email for you. Of course there is a winner's badge we would love you to display on your blog.
Vocals - Robert Pollard
Beth and Dan Cole leave to meet their girls in 8 days and are only $1,000 short of their goal. I'm showing $3611 on their FSP page, so when they hit $4650 they'll be FULLY FUNDED! Two of the most precious words an adoptive family hears on their journey. Beth and Dan are bringing home two girls...
Another scary thing is I have been mowing with the big riding mower right past that nest on the hill and have come so close to hitting it with the blower guard on the mower!
He said that the people of Kpg Entingan and Kpg Nangka were totally in the dark about the perimeter survey exercise being conducted and they were never consulted regarding their land boundary.
The best part was when Phil bought Julia some Christmas themed outfits. We didn't have anything at all Christmas-themed for her, our beautiful surprise December 20th baby, because she wasn't due until January 9th. It wasn't in our minds that it was a possibility that she would come so early (even with all of our earlier drama, at least not thinking she would be as early as before Christmas)
Their reign of terror conducted on the ridge of the Lebombo Mountains next to the Kruger National Park has increased in ferocity over the past few months, the two journalists reported. "Their attacks on farms, community members and illegal immigrants are becoming more frequent."
“By joining these two sci-fi powerhouses, fans will be taken on the ultimate adventure through time and space,” said Liz Kalodner, executive vice president and general manager of CBS Consumer Products.
All Europeans know about this, but Americans may not be acquainted with the Eurovision song contest, an annual rite in which dreadful bands in the EU compete with each other for temporary renown. As my friend Grania wrote, who called this piece to my attention:
Ok la it is a real flight, cos you're going to be air-borne. ^.^
97. He—for there could be no doubt of his sex, though the fashion of the time did something to disguise it—was in the act of slicing at the head of a Moor which swung from the rafters. —Virginia Woolf, Orlando (1928)
Let’s march to stop fatherless homes!
Me and my mum have had a crafty weekend making all sorts of things and when mum
To start with I used the Illamasqua pure white shadow as a dramatic highlighter on Jade’s brow bone and inner eye. Then, I took the Melon pigment across her lid. I used the green Lime Crime pigment to blend Jade’s socket and the turquoise to line under her eye. To give the look extra shape, I added some contouring to the side of her nose by putting some Peaches and Cream pigment under her brows and adjacent to the bridge of her nose. I also made sure that I filled Jade’s brows in so that the darkness of them would contrast the brightness of her eye colours.
Focusing on three friends going on a road trip to a wedding, things begin on a weird tone as Simon (Scatergood) greats Richard (Olak) and Eve (Lewis) with a camera, and intent on filming everything. The opening minutes paint the movie in a more skewed psychological manner, than with a strict horror vein. What we see, gives us a voyeuristic insight into Simon’s mind and it’s a tad unsettling. I myself was thoroughly creeped out by the character, which is a brave move, seeming he is the camera operator and the centre of the story. Once we get into the more supernatural elements of the movie, the reality of the situation becomes further skewed. It’s impressive the level of unease Schelenz is able to generate from a very no thrills approach to everything. It does make me excited for future endeavours, especially those that would have a bigger budget.
This is what Alice would say if we met.
ATTORNEY: Doctor, how many of your autopsies have you performed on
When peace was declared, Jan Christiaan Smuts of South Africa was among the architects of the ‘League Of Nations’, an association of countries established in 1919 by the Treaty of Versailles to promote international cooperation and achieve international peace and security! When it was replaced by the United Nations in 1945, it was Smuts who drafted the Covenant of the United Nations, which is considered to have been his major achievement; but it should also not be forgotten that as a Field Marshal of the Allied Forces during WW2, he enjoyed the respect and friendship of both General Eisenhower and the King of England.
Chapter 7 - Unique Ecosystems
KROFT: My understanding is that you went out with this protector of yours who swore that you were his adopted godson. SOROS: Yes. Yes.
so wonderfully witty and “twangy” before, now sounded idiotic and
So onward to another week of making lunches and discoveries while adhering to the first 3 lessons learned and hopefully the next few discoveries won't be as um, how should I say, frightening to the bento world...
It seems like this week has just been testing, testing, and more testing! That is one thing that I definitely miss about 1st grade, just put the grades into the computer, and ta-dow!!! Here's an average!! This individual testing is a bummer!! It seems as if all day today and yesterday I was calling names and saying ,"come to my table, come to my table, come to my table". Not to mention the math common assessment!! Which is also individual! And of course we also had a walk-through, and they came to my room after my kiddos had been gone for an hour and a half. Can you imagine teaching math to 5-year olds after lunch, PE, and then music? Whew! I am determined to have some St. Patrick's Day fun the rest of this week. I've been getting my things together, because my kiddos are definitely ready for Spring Break, and you can tell by their behavior!!
Rockets flaring purple from the green banks
I guess MZZZ. Bormann, that it never occurred to a LIBERAL Attorney- that YOU as part of the .GOV are now advocating throwing out the First Amendment protections of religion, did it?
Cortijo said the group lingered by the river a few minutes, apparently to see if a boat would pass by so they could ask for some tools, something authorities say they had done in the past.
Three years ago Lexi Strauss was an ordinary freshman girl at Covington High. She had a dramaholic, boy-crazy best friend that she adored. And her biggest dilemma was figuring out how to get Xander, her older brother’s gorgeous best friend, to see her as more than just “Little Lexi.”
I don't handle this type of frustration well, and have an almost insurmountable urge to throw something.
Greetings...
The new feature can net you additional gigs of space, but, as with most storage gains on Dropbox, you’ve got to work for it a little. This boost would give you the same threshold of free storage as the just-launched Google Drive – 5 gigabytes.
Cops deny 10111 down for 36hrs
Putting Faith Under House Arrest
Blaming the Great War on the masons’ entente: Friedrich Wichtl,
Did I mention I failed my 3-hour glucose test by one point? (One fricken point!) I did. Even though I am not overweight, stick to a healthy diet and run myself ragged working full-time and caring for a toddler, I have gestational diabetes.
Yesterday was one of those mentally exhausting days. It started with some Michel Thomas French lessons and work on my book proposal in the morning. On my walk to work, I was fired up, a million things buzzing in my head. Fantastique.
Most email campaign services, in other words, are the equivalent of dropping your book announcement off the top of a building, and hoping it lands in front of someone who might be interested.
Here then, for Jim and Sofia, a few words from Dickens, from the same place they now inhabit, but a time quite distant.
I’m half way there, ladies and gentlemen. I’ve made it half way!
Although teaser #16 brings forth a similar aura of abstract elegance as previous releases, this video takes a step away from the dark and edgy theme and shows us D.O. and Su Ho’s purer sides instead.
At present low, but will soon be better.
Last week I had sex with Marcus. Marcus is an actual person, a porn star, and he has a 9 inch cock. He fits the perfect measurements that my research established in Size Queen (click here to read that) and for a very good reason. His head was small enough that he entered me gradually but thick enough that once he was in there he filled every nook and cranny. He’s big, and there were, ah-hem, things (for lack of a better word) that he skimmed when he was up there that don’t see many visitors.
